
Learning Objectives , After completing this course, you will be able to:

Define cloud computing and explain its essential characteristics, evolution, and business case for cloud adoption
Explain how some of the emerging technologies, such as the Internet of Things, Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, and Analytics, are being supported by the cloud
Define the cloud service models (IaaS, PaaS, SaaS) and deployment models(Public, Private, Hybrid)
Describe the concepts and components of cloud infrastructure such as virtualization, virtual machines, bare metal servers, and containers
Explain different cloud storage models including Direct Attached, File, Block, Object Storage, and CDNs
Explain emergent trends  related to cloud computing including Hybrid Multicloud, Microservices, Serverless computing, Cloud Native, DevOps, and Application Modernization
Describe the concepts in cloud security and how organizations in different industries are benefiting from cloud
List the job roles and career opportunities available in cloud computing
Create an account on a IBM Cloud platform and deploy a cloud service


---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

module1:

Learning Objectives, After completing this module, you will be able to:

Define cloud computing
Describe the essential characteristics of cloud computing
Briefly recount the history and evolution of cloud computing
Describe the key considerations that organizations can use as a guide while creating their cloud strategy
Describe the key cloud service providers and their services
Create an account on a public cloud platform

Cloud computing, also referred to as “the cloud,” is the delivery of on-demand computing resources— everything from applications to data centers— over the internet on a pay-for-use basis. To get a common understanding of cloud computing, let’s start with the US National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST’s) definition of cloud computing. NIST defines cloud computing as :
	a model for enabling convenient, on-demand network access to a shared pool of configurable computing resources that can be rapidly provisioned and released with minimal management effort or service provider interaction.
	
	Examples of computing resources include networks, servers, storage, applications, and services.

This cloud model is composed of five essential characteristics, three deployment models, and three service models.

Let’s start with understanding the five essential characteristics of the cloud:
	which include on-demand self-service, broad network access, resource pooling, rapid elasticity,and measured service.

 The 1st characteristic, On-demand Self-service, means that you get access to cloud resources such as the processing power, storage, and network you need, using a simple interface, without requiring human interaction with each service provider.

The 2nd characteristic, Broad Network Access, means that cloud computing resources can be accessed via the network through standard mechanisms and platforms such as mobile phones, tablets, laptops, and workstations.

The 3rd characteristic, Resource Pooling, is what gives cloud providers economies of scale, which they pass on to their customers, making cloud cost-efficient. Using a multi-tenant model, computing resources are pooled to serve multiple consumers; cloud resources are dynamically assigned and reassigned, according to demand, without customers needing to concern themselves with the physical location of these resources.

The 4th characteristic, Rapid Elasticity, implies that you can access more resources when you need them, and scale back when you don’t—because resources are elastically provisioned and released.

The 5th characteristic, Measured Service, means that you only pay for what you use or reserve as you go; if you’re not using resources, you’re not paying. Resource usage is monitored, measured, and reported transparently based on utilization.

As we see, cloud computing is really about utilizing technology “as a service”—leveraging remote systems on-demand over the open internet, scaling up and scaling back, and paying for what you use. It is a revolution in that it has changed the way the world consumes compute services by making them more cost-efficient while also making organizations more agile in responding to changes in their markets.

As I mentioned earlier in this talk, the cloud model is composed of five essential characteristics,
three deployment models, and three service models.
We just went over the five essential characteristics.

While we will go into greater depth of the deployment and the service models in the later
videos, let me leave you with a brief overview of these models.

There are three types of cloud deployment models—Public, Private, and Hybrid.

Public cloud is when you leverage cloud services over the open internet on hardware owned by the cloud provider, but its usage is shared by other companies.

Private cloud means that the cloud infrastructure is provisioned for exclusive use by a single organization.It could run on-premises or it could be owned, managed, and operated by a service provider.

And when you use a mix of both public and private clouds, working together seamlessly, that is classified as the Hybrid model.

Now, let’s look at the three service models that are based on the three layers in a computing stack - Infrastructure, Platform, and Applications.
These cloud computing models are aptly referred to as 
Infrastructure as a Service (Iaas),
Platform as a Service (PaaS), 
Software as a Service (SaaS).

In an Infrastructure as a Service model, you get access to infrastructure and physical computing resources such as servers, networking, storage, and data center space - without the need to manage or operate them.

In a Platform as a Service model, you get access to the platform, that is the hardware and software tools, usually those needed to develop and deploy applications to users over the Internet.

Software as a Service is a software licensing and delivery model in which software and applications are centrally hosted and licensed on a subscription basis, and sometimes also referred to as "on-demand software."

In the next video, we will go over some of the key evolutions that brings us to what cloud computing is today.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Cloud computing is an evolution of technology over time.The concept of cloud computing dates to the 1950s when large-scale mainframes with high-volume processing power became available. In order to make efficient use of the computing power of mainframes, the practice of time sharing, or resource pooling, evolved. Using dumb terminals, whose sole purpose was to facilitate access to the mainframes, multiple
users were able to access the same data storage layer and CPU power from any terminal. In the 1970s, with the release of an operating system called Virtual Machine (VM), it became possible for mainframes to have multiple virtual systems, or virtual machines, on a single
physical node.The virtual machine operating system evolved the 1950s application of shared access of a mainframe by allowing multiple distinct compute environments to exist on the same physical hardware. Each virtual machine hosted guest operating systems that behaved as though they had their own memory, CPU, and hard drives, even though these were shared resources. Virtualization thus became a technology driver and a huge catalyst for some of the biggest evolutions in communications and computing. Even 20 years ago, physical hardware was quite expensive. With the internet becoming more accessible, and the need to make hardware costs more viable, servers were virtualized into shared hosting environments, virtual private servers, and virtual dedicated servers, using the same types of functionality provided by the virtual machine operating system. So, for example, if a company needed ‘x’ number of physical systems to run their applications, they could take one physical node and split it into multiple virtual systems.This was enabled by hypervisors.
A hypervisor is a small software layer that enables multiple operating systems to run alongside each other, sharing the same physical computing resources. A hypervisor also separates the Virtual Machines logically, assigning each its own slice of the underlying computing power, memory, and storage, preventing the virtual machines from interfering with each other. So, if, for example, one operating system suffers a crash or a security compromise, the others keep working.As technologies and hypervisors improved and were able to share and deliver resources reliably, some companies decided to make the cloud’s benefits accessible to users who didn’t
have an abundance of physical servers to create their own cloud computing infrastructure. Since the servers were already online, the process of spinning up a new instance was instantaneous. Users could now order cloud resources they needed from a larger pool of available resources, and they could pay for them on a per-use basis, also known as Pay-As-You-Go.This pay-as-you-go or utility computing model became one of the key drivers behind cloud computing taking off. The pay-per-use model allowed companies and even individual developers to pay for the computing resources as and when they used them, just like units of electricity. This allowed them to switch to a more cash-flow friendly OpEx model from a CapEx model. This model appealed to all sizes of companies, those who had little or no hardware, and even those that had lots of hardware, because now, instead of making huge capital expenditures in hardware, they could pay for compute resources as and when needed. It also allowed them to scale their workloads during usage peaks, and scale down when usage
subsided.And this gave rise to modern-day cloud computing.The impact of the evolution of the cloud has been immense.

In the next training, we will go over some key considerations for cloud adoption.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Every organization’s transformation journey is unique, and therefore every organization’s cloud adoption strategy is also unique to them.
Agility, flexibility, and competitiveness are key drivers for moving to the cloud, provided it is done without creating business disruption or issues related to security, compliance,and performance.Let’s look at some key considerations that organizations can use as a guide while working through their cloud strategy.

The first consideration is infrastructure and workloads.The cost of building and operating data centers can become astronomical.
On the other hand, low initial costs and pay-as-you-go attributes of cloud computing can add up to significant cost savings.
Also, a point to consider is that not all workloads may be ready for the cloud, as-is.

The second consideration is around SaaS and development platforms.Organizations need to consider if paying for application access is a more viable option than purchasing off-the-shelf software and subsequently investing in upgrades. Organizations also need to consider speed and productivity—what it means for them to get a new application up and running in ‘x’ hours on the cloud versus a couple
of weeks, even months on traditional platforms. And the person-hour cost efficiencies they gain from using cloud dashboards, real-time
statistics, and active analytics.

Lastly, organizations need to consider the impact of making a wrong decision—their risk exposure. Is it riskier, for example, for them to invest in the hardware and software or rent by the hour? Is it safer for them to work on a 12-month plan to build, write, test, and release the code if they’re uncertain about adoption? And is it better for them to “try” something new paying-as-you-go rather than making long-term decisions based on little or no trial or adoption?

Let’s look at some of the benefits of cloud adoption, categorized broadly into Flexibility, Efficiency, and Strategic Value.

Cloud gives us flexibility.
Users can scale back or scale up services to fit their needs, customize applications, and access cloud services from anywhere with an internet connection. Cloud infrastructure scales on demand to support fluctuating workloads.Organizations can determine their level of control with as-a-service options. Users can select from a menu of pre-built tools and features to build a solution that fits their specific needs. And Virtual Private Clouds, encryption, and API keys help keep data secure.

Cloud also brings great efficiency.
Enterprise users can get applications to market quickly without worrying about underlying infrastructure costs or its maintenance.
Cloud-based applications and data are accessible from virtually any internet-connected device.Hardware failures do not result in data loss because of networked backups. Cloud computing uses remote resources, saving organizations the cost of servers and other
equipment, and paying on use-basis. Cloud services give enterprises a competitive advantage by providing the most innovative
technologies available while managing the underlying infrastructure, thus enabling organizations to focus on their priorities.

While cloud brings great opportunity, it also introduces challenges for business leaders and IT departments.

Some of these perceived risks include: Data security, associated with loss or unavailability of data causing business disruption; Governance and sovereignty issues; Legal, regulatory, and compliance issues; Lack of standardization in how the constantly evolving technologies integrate and interoperate; Choosing the right deployment and service models to serve specific needs; Partnering with the right cloud service providers; Concerns related to business continuity and disaster recovery.Organizations can no longer think of cloud adoption as something that is to be looked at in the future. With the right cloud adoption strategies, technologies, services, and service providers, these risks can be mitigated.

In the next training, we’re going to look at some of the key cloud service providers of our times, and the services they offer.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Let’s look at some numbers and predictions that help us see the scale cloud is predicted to achieve in the coming years.¯

Gartner predicts:
The worldwide public cloud service market to grow from $182.4 B in 2018 to $331.2 B in 2022, attaining a compound annual growth rate (CAGR) of 12.6%.
	
	Spending on Infrastructure-as-a-Service to increase from $30.5 B in 2018 to $76.6 B in 2022, growing 27.5% in a year.

	Platform-as-a-Service spending to grow from $15.6 B in 2018 to $31.8B 2022, growing 21.8% in a year.

	With software investments shifting from cloud-first to cloud-only, spending on Sofware-as-a-Service is expected to grow from $80 B in 2018 to $143.7 B in 2022.

What is clear is that cloud is accelerating faster than predicted, adoption is high, and revenues are soaring.
The question for businesses today is no longer “if” they need to adopt the cloud, rather “what” their cloud adoption strategy should be to best serve their businesses and customers.Keeping up with this technological wave, and driving it forward, are the Cloud Service
Providers with a wide range of services.
We will now talk about some of the major Cloud Service Providers in alphabetical order.

Alibaba Cloud, also known as Aliyun, while relatively new, is the largest Chinese cloud computing service provider. Aliyun provides a comprehensive suite of global cloud computing services to power not just their customers’ online businesses but also the Alibaba Group’s own e-commerce ecosystem. It offers a host of products and services such as compute, network, storage, security, monitoring and managing, communication, analytics, IoT, application development, data migration, web hosting, and more.

One of the first to enter the cloud computing space, Amazon Web Services, or AWS Cloud, offers an extensive range of Infrastructure and Platform services to individuals, companies, and governments on a metered pay-as-you-go basis. The Amazon Cloud provides a wide range of products, services, and solutions ranging from Compute, DevOps, Data, Analytics, IoT, Machine Learning, Networking, Content Delivery,
Robotics, Serverless Computing, and much more.

Google Cloud Platform, or GCP, is a suite of cloud computing services, providing Infrastructure, Platform, and Serverless Computing environments. Google also uses GCP internally for their end-user products such as Google Search and YouTube. Google Cloud includes G Suite with products for communication, productivity, collaboration, storage, and more. The Google App Engine is a platform for developing and hosting web applications in Google-managed data centers, automatically allocating and de-allocating resources to handle demand.

IBM cloud is a full stack cloud platform that spans public, private, and hybrid environments with products and services covering compute, network, storage, management, security, DevOps,and databases. Some of their prominent offerings include their Bare Metal Servers, VMWare, Cloud Paks for Application Modernization, Virtual Private Cloud, and the suite of emerging technologies such as AI, IoT, Blockchain, Data and Analytics. With the acquisition of Red Hat, IBM is also positioning itself as the leading hybrid cloud
provider of our times.

Microsoft Azure is a flexible cloud platform for building, testing, deploying, and managing applications and services through Microsoft-managed data centers. With its data centers spread out in many regions, Azure provides a global reach with a local presence.
It provides Software, Platform, and Infrastructure services supporting Microsoft-specific and third-party languages, tools, and frameworks.

Oracle Cloud is primarily known for Software as a Service and Database as a Service (also known as the Oracle Data Cloud). Oracle’s SaaS offering includes wide-ranging applications such as ERP, SCM, HCM, Marketing, Sales, and CX running in the cloud.And the Oracle Data Cloud provides one of the largest cloud-based data management platforms helping customers personalize their online, offline, and mobile marketing campaigns, for targeted audiences. Oracle Cloud also provides some cloud Infrastructure and Platform services.

Salesforce specializes in their Software as a Service offering that focuses on customer relationship management, supporting businesses to better connect with their customers, partners, and potential customers.Salesforce offers multiple cloud services such as Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, and Marketing Cloud, helping customers track analytics in real-time, customer success and support, customer complaints, even listening in to customers across social platforms to automatically route them to appropriate agents for resolution.

SAP is known for Enterprise software and applications such as ERP, CRM, HR, and Finance, running in the cloud.There is also an SAP Cloud Platform for building and extending business applications with rapid innovation cycles in a secure cloud computing environment managed by SAP.

In the next video, we’re going to look at the business case for cloud computing.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

		In this module, you have learned:

		● Cloud computing is the delivery of on-demand computing resources over the internet on a pay-as-you-go basis; resources are dynamically assigned and reassigned among multiple users and scale up and down in response to users’ needs.

		● The origins of cloud computing can be traced back to the mainframes of the 1950s, with virtualization technologies and hypervisors serving as catalysts for the emergence of modern-day cloud computing.

		● Organizations must consider their business needs, investment viability, and risk capacity in order to create a cloud adoption strategy that delivers desired benefits without causing business disruptions and security, compliance, or performance issues.

		● Cloud adoption is growing faster than predicted. Driving this technological wave are cloud service providers with a host of services ranging from Infrastructure, Platform, and Software services. Some major Cloud providers of our times include AWS, Alibaba Cloud, Google, IBM Cloud, and Microsoft Azure.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
module2:

Learning Objectives, After completing this module, you will be able to:

Describe the business case for cloud adoption and case studies that demonstrate the impact businesses have created by adopting cloud
Explain how emerging technologies such as the Internet of Things, Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, and Analytics are being accelerated by the Cloud

Cloud adoption is no longer a thing of the future. From a single individual to a global multi-billion-dollar enterprise, anybody can access the computing capacity they need on the cloud. The lag time from decision to value is no longer a journey of years with high upfront capital; cloud makes it possible for businesses to experiment, fail, and learn much faster than ever before, with low risk exposure. Businesses today have greater freedom to change course than to live with the consequences of expensive decisions taken in the past. According to an IBM Institute for Business Value study, more than three-quarters of enterprises today are using cloud computing to expand into new industries. 74% have adopted cloud to improve customer experience; and 71% use cloud to create enhanced products and services—while simultaneously downsizing legacy systems and reducing costs. To remain competitive, businesses need to be able to respond quickly to marketplace changes, use analytics to understand customer experience, and apply that understanding to adapt their products and services based on what they learn. Product lifecycles have shortened, and barriers to entry have become lower.Today’s enablers for growth, agility, and innovation include:
Cognitively-enabled workflows, 
Applied exponential technologies such as AI, Automation, IoT, and Blockchain,
Applications that span new and legacy solutions; 
and Open hybrid and secure Multicloud infrastructures.

The power, scalability, flexibility, and pay-as-you-go economics of cloud provides the foundation for this transformation.
The International Data Corporation, IDC, predicts that by 2025, the total amount of digital data created worldwide will rise to 163 zettabytes (where one zettabyte is equivalent to a trillion gigabytes). And 30% of this data will be real-time information.

Considering the unprecedented amounts of data being produced daily, and the ability to make data-driven decisions crucial to any business, cloud computing becomes essential for businesses to succeed, sustain, and compete in today’s markets.

A cloud strategy, more than just an IT strategy, is the core component of any business strategy today.
Businesses that haven’t already, or are not currently, integrating cloud into their business strategy, run the risk of lacking the speed, agility, innovation, and decision-making capacities needed to be competitive, as also their ability to respond to digital disruption.

In the next video, we’ll look at some case studies that demonstrate the impact businesses have created by adopting cloud.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

In this video, we will look at how some of the leading businesses have transformed the way they work to provide better customer service, remove barriers to innovation, achieve enterprise scale, and accelerate growth, using cloud technologies. Although the case studies we’ll look at are curated from IBM Cloud, similar stories with dramatic impact to business can be found across the spectrum of companies utilizing other Cloud Service providers as well.

BETTER CUSTOMER SERVICE: In the highly competitive airline industry, customer experience is a major point of differentiation, and digital channels are increasingly important.To become more responsive to customer needs, American Airlines needed a new technology
platform and a new approach to development that would help it deliver digital self-service tools and customer value more rapidly across its enterprise. The airline recognized the opportunity to remove the constraints of their existing customer-facing applications based on monolithic code into cloud-native based microservices architecture on the cloud.
The results: Faster development and release of new apps.Improved operational reliability, productivity, and end customer response times.
Cost savings by avoiding existing upgrade costs via migration to the IBM Cloud.

REMOVING BARRIERS TO INNOVATION: As a lean organization with a self-imposed limit on headcount, UBank excels at finding innovative ways to meet demands.Continually challenged to find more efficient ways to operate, UBank’s IT team explored a Platform as a Service (PaaS) cloud development model.Their need was to give more control to their developers, reduce the need for additional resources, faster speed to market, and removing barriers in going from an idea to production. UBank launched new initiatives in an IBM Cloud Platform environment, including a virtual assistant that incorporates IBM Watson technology to support the bank’s online home loan application.
The results: Faster time to market made possible through the Cloud Platform framework that streamlines development and empowers product teams. Foster greater innovation with cloud-based development resources that are quick, easy, and cost-effective to deploy.More efficient operations.

DEMAND FOR ENTERPRISE SCALE: Since its inception in 2008, Bitly has journeyed from a startup that offered intelligent link-shortening technology adopted by users to compress lengthy URLs for social media posts, to an enterprise product.Seeking an agile, cost-effective IT infrastructure to support this transition, Bitly started planning for cloud migration. Their need was to have a cloud-based model with pay-as-you-go pricing, the ability to scale up and scale down, a more global presence, and the ability to geodistribute into more
POPs. And they wanted it to be low-risk. Bitly migrated to an IBM Cloud environment, establishing a scalable hosting platform for
low-latency delivery to enterprise customers around the world.
The results: 25 billion data-infused links migrated from one hosting site to Cloud infrastructure with data center locations worldwide.
1 billion user interaction data set stored and managed in a flexible, cost-effective Cloud Object Storage environment. Transformed IT operations to scale for growth, control costs and focus valuable resources on new product development.

ACCELERATING GROWTH: Financial traders demand extreme speed and availability from trading systems.Profitability depends on split-second decisions. As a leading online broker in forex, commodities, equities, cryptocurrencies, indices, and other financial instruments, ActivTrades enables investors to buy and sell on numerous financial markets. Investors need reliable access to accurate market information, combined with the ability to move rapidly to execute trades. As its client base grew, ActivTrades wanted to cut latency, accelerate execution, and streamline the delivery of new functions. ActivTrades migrated three major trading systems from on-premises infrastructure to IBM Cloud for VMware solutions, backed by data storage, networking, and security offerings on the IBM Cloud.
The results: Up to 3X performance boost, helping clients seize fleeting opportunities for profit. Security-rich cloud platform with ultra-high availability protects client investments. Hours, not days to fire up new resources, for faster response to emerging requirements.

In the next video, we’ll look at some of the emerging technologies that are available on the cloud and the opportunities they bring to businesses.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

IOT:

In this new era technologies such as Internet of Things, Big Data, artificial intelligence, and blockchain are disrupting existing business models and industries while creating unprecedented opportunities for businesses to differentiate themselves and create value for their clients. The power, scale, dynamic nature, and economics of the cloud resources make cloud computing a key enabler for adoption and evolution of these emerging technologies. In this video, we will look at how the Internet of Things, or IoT, powered by cloud, is making a big difference for businesses today. The Internet of Things, or IoT, is a giant network of connected things and people that have changed much of how we live our daily lives - from the way we drive, to how we make purchases, monitoring our personal health, and even how we get energy for our homes. Smart devices and sensors are continuously tracking and collecting data. For example, a smart building could have thousands of sensors measuring all kinds of data related to thermal, optical, structural, and environmental stimuli. An unprecedented amount of data is being generated, putting a tremendous strain on the Internet. That is where the cloud comes in, by connecting the IoT device user to the cloud - be it for device registration, device identity, storing data, or accessing enterprise data. Data collected through IoT devices is stored and processed on the cloud since IoT devices can be in a state of motion, the cloud serves as a collection point in closest proximity, minimizing the latency in reporting up the data points and providing a response back to the IoT application. So, from IOT platforms running entirely on the cloud to the interfaces used by customers to interact these devices, to the backend analytics platforms - cloud computing supports and enables IoT. Cloud service providers also
offer specialized IoT services designed to help speed up the development of IoT solutions. Let's look at a case study that demonstrates the use of the IoT on the cloud to combat the poaching of endangered rhinos at Welgevonden by making poaching predictable.

The rhinos have become one of the the key species that is becoming endangered due to poaching throughout Africa. But now especially in South Africa. Up until now, poachers have been increasing in numbers, and they become more militarized with weapons. And so of course we've had to do the same. This is not sustainable. The only way to do this better, is to bring in technology and things that they do not have. This endangered species is getting help from some unexpected friends, the zebra and antelope. They're wearing IoT sensors connected to the IBM cloud. When poachers enter the area, the animals run for it, which alerts Rangers who can track their emotions and help stop them before any harm is done. It's a smart way to help increase the Rhino population and turn the poachers into the endangered species. 

In the next video we're going to look at how artificial intelligence on the cloud is impacting businesses.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

AI:

Making sense of the endless streams of data is where Artificial Intelligence, or AI, comes in. Many of the applications where we apply AI today simply wouldn't have been possible without the scalable, on-demand computing offered by the cloud. There is a three-way relationship between AI, IoT, and Cloud. Just as AI consumes the data produced by IoT devices, the IoT devices’ behavior can be
dictated based on responses from AI. For example, Smart Assistants, a common type of IoT device, continues to learn about the user’s preferences as usage grows, such as the songs they like, their home temperature settings, preferred meal times, and over time they anticipate their actions based on the user’s past history. So, what we see is a symbiotic relationship between IoT, AI, and Cloud.
IoT delivers the data, AI powers the insights, and both these emerging technologies leverage cloud’s scalability and processing power to provide value to individuals and businesses alike. Let’s look at how the United States Tennis Association, USTA, is using AI on the Cloud
to deliver unique digital experiences to millions of fans around the world.For two weeks at the end of every summer, tennis fans around the world turn their eyes to New York city, and the US Open.Hundreds of thousands onsite, and millions more online. But where you see tennis, IBM sees data; the scores and statistics, the sights, the sounds. IBM integrates and analyzes the data flowing from the court.
And delivers unique digital experiences to more than ten million tennis fans around the world.And we do it all in the IBM Cloud.
The IBM Cloud is the digital foundation of the US Open. It scales rapidly to meet a five thousand percent increase in web traffic.
And it delivers a consistant experience to our fans all around the globe.And with Watson on the IBM Cloud, we can engage fans in unique ways, year after year. Slam Tracker analyzes more than twenty-six million historical data points.It gives fans deep insight into featured matches, and it can see the momentum of a match shifting in real time.AI Highlights uses Watson to process thousands of hours of US Open video.It can hear the cheers of the crowd.It can see a player celebrating.And it knows what makes a great tennis highlight.
And this year we're putting the power of AI Highlights into the hands of US players and coaches. Watson is analyzing match video, so coaches can quickly find the footage they need to guide the development of their players.And if you need to know where to park, find a good burger, or grab the latest US Open gear, you can find the answers with the Guest Information feature in the US Open app and mobile web, using Watson. We work with IBM because they keep us on the cutting edge of the fan experience.They help us to adopt the latest technology, like Cloud and AI.And they bring data to life in a way that's accessible and engaging for our fans. 

In the next video, we’re going to look at how Blockchain and Analytics on the cloud are impacting businesses.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Block Chain and Analytics:


Blockchain is a secure, distributed, open technology that can help speed up processes, lower costs, and build transparency and traceability in transactional applications. It is an immutable Network allowing members to view only those transactions that are relevant to them. The more open, diverse, and distributed the network, the stronger the trust and transparency in the data and transactions. 85% of businesses today rely on multiple clouds to meet their IT needs, with more than 70% using more than three. These businesses need to be able to move applications and data across multiple clouds easily and securely, leading to the emerging demand to build and manage business applications such as blockchain for the multi cloud environment. Blockchain and AI, much like IoT and AI, powered by the cloud, also have a three-way relationship. Where blockchain technology provides the trusted, decentralized source of truth, AI powers the analytics and decision-making from the data collected, and cloud provides globally distributed, scalable, and cost-efficient computing resources to support both the unprecedented amounts of data being collected and the processing power required to draw insights from this data. Blockchain serves to make AI more understandable by recording the data and variables that go
into a decision made in an AI algorithm, leading to greater trust and transparency in the conclusions and decisions made by these algorithms. Let's look at how blockchain on the cloud is helping farmers reduce waste at times of recall by building traceability and transparency in the food supply chain. For farmers here, this is our life's work. 60% of the nation's lettuce is grown right here in Salinas. When it comes down to how plants are looked at, I really relate back to how humans are raised and nurtured. I want to make sure
that everything is safe before it leaves the ranch. But when a recall happens,perfectly good food goes to waste. You have to take all product off your shelf,no matter what age, no matter where it came from. And it takes resources to grow those things. Now we're actually eating into our future food supply. But we've gotta way around that. With Blockchain technology on the IBM cloud we're able to track our product within seconds. Giving the consumers instant access where the product came from, in case there's any recall so we don't have to take all the food off the shelves.Having that instant access allows you to reduce the waste. There's a lot of starving people in this world. I want to be a generation that fixes that. Analytics technologies on the cloud leverage the flexibility, scalability, and computing resources available on the cloud. From tracking trends on social media to predict future events, to analyzing data to build machine learning models that can be deployed in cognitive applications, cloud provides the integrated environment that is required to leverage data for continuous improvement and accelerated business growth. Let's look at how KONE has invested in cloud and IoT technologies to power a data analytics and predictive maintenance solution for city infrastructure used by more than 1 billion people daily. At KONE we manufacture elevators, escalators, auto walks, and doors All of these devices are streams of data that we are collecting. In order to process those streams, we need a scalable way of handling the amount of data that is coming in. And that's where cloud function fits in perfectly. We handle that data with event-driven architecture. We use functions to persist that data, and to generate further events on that data, that are then utilized and consumed by applications, our customers and users. In our analytics
platform, we analyzed the set of data and we generate value predictive in a sense that we can predict the failure rate to a certain percentage that is about to happen in the future for our equipment. And this allows us to perform predictive maintenance. And this is kind of the whole concept that we have behind our 24/7 connected services, which is a promise to our customers. That the equipment is connected to the cloud and we are monitoring it. And that's where we generate the real value for our customers. At the moment we use almost all aspects of the IBM cloud. We use storage from the cloud. We use cloud function. We use messaging services. We use IoT services. So a number of services already in use and platform. And that use will only grow as our digital footprint in the industry grows.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------
		In this module, you have learned:

		● The adoption of cloud technologies is enabling enterprises, big and small, to be agile, innovative, and competitive, and to create differentiated customer experiences. The question organizations are asking is not whether they should move to the cloud, rather what strategy they should adopt to move to the cloud.

		● Some case studies that demonstrate the impact businesses have created by adopting cloud
			o  American Airlines adopting cloud technologies to deliver customer value rapidly across its enterprise
			o  UBank leveraging cloud platform services to give more control to their developers thereby removing barriers to innovation
			o  Bitly leveraging the scalability offered by cloud infrastructure for low-latency delivery to its geographically 	disbursed enterprise customers
			o  ActivTrades leveraging the infrastructure, storage, network, and security offerings on the cloud to accelerate execution and delivery of new functions in their online trading systems to their customers

		● Emerging technologies, powered by the cloud, are disrupting existing business models and creating unprecedented opportunities for businesses to grow, innovate, and create value for their customers.

		● Some case studies that demonstrate how the use of emerging technologies on the cloud is creating value for millions around the world.
			o   The use of the Internet of Things on the cloud to combat poaching of endangered rhinos in South Africa
			o   Artificial Intelligence on the cloud being leveraged to deliver unique digital experiences to millions of fans around the world by the United States Tennis Association
			o   Blockchain on the cloud helping farmers reduce waste by building traceability and transparency in the food supply chain
			o   The use of data analytics for driving predictive maintenance solutions for a city’s infrastructure by KONE

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
module3:

Learning Objectives, After completing this module, you will be able to:

Describe the features, benefits, and use cases for the three main cloud service models—Infrastructure-as-a-Service (IaaS), Platform-as-a-Service (PaaS), and Software-as-a-Service (SaaS
Describe the features, benefits, and use cases for the three main cloud deployment models—Public, Private, and Hybrid


In our introductory cloud video we briefly talked about the three service models available on the cloud. Infrastructure as a Service, Platform as a Service, and Software as a Service. Before we dive into the details of each of these service models in the subsequent videos, let's get started with a quick overview of these models. 

Hi, I'm Tessa Rhodes, and I'm a designer on IBM Cloud. So let's start with the foundation here with IaaS. IaaS is a set of compute
networking and storage resources that have been virtualized by a vendor so that a user can access and configure them any way they want. In design we have a concept of talking about users, called personas, and the persona for IaaS is a system admin, or an IT admin. 

Let's jump up to the top with Software as a Service that's the easy one. Software as a Service is just software that you don't have to install on your machine and you don't have to manually update. And so the user for Software as a Service could be anyone. In fact, if you're watching this on YouTube right now, then you're a user of Software as a Service. It's usually charged on a subscription model rather than a one-time license fee. 

And that brings us to Platform as a Service. PaaS takes advantage of all the virtualized resources from Iaas and then just abstracts them away, so the user doesn't have to worry about managing any of those virtualized resources. The user for PaaS is not a system admin, usually. It's usually a dev. At IBM we call this dev, Jane.That's the name of our persona. 

And so this whole metaphor, the pyramid metaphor, is meant to indicate that as you move down, you're increasing complexity in terms of your knowledge and management of infrastructure resources. And you're increasing the ease of use. Another metaphor I use when I'm talking to the designers on my team about PaaS, is having to do with a car. 

So in this metaphor IaaS is like leasing a car. So if you've ever leased a car, you probably did a lot of research, and you care about the specs of the car and their performance. You care about the color of the car, what kind of car it is. You're the one driving and you're the one paying for it. You're also paying for the gas and any tolls or maintenance. 

With Platform as a Service in this metaphor, that's more like renting a car. So say you're on vacation and you just got off at the air Airport and you're going to pick up your rental car. You don't really care what color it is. You don't even care about the specs of it, but you're still driving and you're paying for the gas and any tolls you go through. 

Software as a Service is again the easiest one. That one's more like getting a taxi or an uber. So with the taxi or an uber, you don't care at all about what kind of car it is, what color it is. And in fact, you're not even the one driving, or paying for gas, or any tolls because that's baked into the price. 

So let's see what it means in terms of cloud computing and its three service models:

with IaaS the cloud provider manages the physical resources, data centers, cooling power, Network and security, as well as computing resources that include servers and storage. 
With PaaS, the provider, in addition to the computing resources, also manages the platform infrastructure which includes the operating systems, development tools, databases, and business analytics. 

In the SaaS model, in addition to the infrastructure and the platform resources, the provider also hosts and manages the applications and data. 

In the next video, we'll take a closer look at infrastructure-as-a-service its features, benefits, and some use cases.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

In our introductory cloud video, we briefly mentioned the three service models for cloud. In this video, we will discuss the Infrastructure-as-a-Service model in more detail.

Infrastructure-as-a-Service, commonly referred to as “IaaS,” – or simply “eye-ass”
- is a form of cloud computing that delivers fundamental compute, network, and storage resources to consumers on-demand, over the internet, on a pay-as-you-go basis. The cloud provider hosts the infrastructure components traditionally present in an on-premises
data center as well as the virtualization or hypervisor layer. In an IaaS Cloud environment, customers can create or provision virtual machines (or VMs) in their choice of Region and Zone available from the Cloud Provider. These VMs typically come pre-installed the customer’s choice of operating system. The customers can then deploy middleware, install applications, and run workloads on these VMs.
They can also and create storage for their workloads and backups. Cloud providers often provide customers the ability to track and monitor the performance and usage of their cloud services and manage disaster recovery. Let’s look at the key components of cloud infrastructure:

Physical data centers: IaaS providers manage large data centers that contain the physical machines required to power the various layers of abstraction on top of them. In most IaaS models, end users do not interact directly with the physical infrastructure but experience it as a service provided to them.

Compute: IaaS providers manage the hypervisors and end-users programmatically provision virtual instances with desired amounts of compute, memory, and storage resources. Cloud compute typically comes with supporting services like auto scaling and load balancing
that provide scalability and high performance.

Network: Users get access to networking resources on the cloud through virtualization or programmatically, through APIs.

Storage: There are three types of cloud data storage: object, file, and block storage. Object storage is the most common mode of storage 
in the cloud, given that it is highly distributed and resilient.

IaaS supports a wide array of use cases. We’ll look at some typical use cases here.

Organizations today are using cloud infrastructure services to enable their teams to set up test and development environments faster, helping create new applications more quickly.By abstracting the low-level components, cloud infrastructure is helping developers focus
more on business logic than infrastructure management.Business continuity and disaster recovery require a significant amount of technology and staff investments. IaaS is helping organizations reduce this cost and make applications and data accessible as usual during a disaster or outage.

Organizations are using cloud infrastructure to deploy their web applications faster and also scale infrastructure up and down as demand fluctuates.

Organizations are leveraging the high-performance computing capabilities of cloud infrastructure to solve complex problems involving millions of variables and calculations, such as climate and weather predictions and financial modeling. Mining massive data sets to locate valuable patterns, trends, and associations requires a huge amount of processing power.Cloud infrastructure not only provides the required high-performance computing but also makes it economically viable.

While there are some concerns regarding the lack of transparency in the cloud infrastructure’s configuration and management and dependency on a third-party for workload availability and performance Infrastructure-as-a-Service is the fastest growing cloud model today.

In the next video, we will look at Platform-as-a-Service model, its features, benefits, and some use cases.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Platform-as-a-Service, commonly referred to as “PaaS,” is a cloud computing model that provides customers a complete platform—hardware, software, and infrastructure—to develop,deploy, manage, and run applications created by them or acquired from a third-party.
The PaaS provider hosts everything—servers, networks, storage, operating system, application runtimes, APIs, middleware, databases, and other tools—at their data center.The provider also takes responsibility for the installation, configuration, and operation
of the application infrastructure, leaving the user responsible for only the application code and its maintenance.Customers pay for this service on a usage basis and purchase resources on-demand.

With IaaS, the cloud provider offers access to ‘raw’ computing resources, such as servers, storage, and networking, while the user is responsible for the platform and application software.With PaaS, the cloud service provider delivers and manages the entire platform infrastructure,abstracting users from the lower-level details of the environment.

Let’s look at some essential characteristics of Platform-as-a-Service:

PaaS clouds are distinguished by the high level of abstraction they provide to the users, eliminating the complexity of deploying applications, configuring infrastructure, and provisioning and configuring supporting technologies like load balancers and databases.¯
PaaS clouds provide services and APIs that help simplify the job of developers in delivering elastically scalable and highly available cloud applications. These services typically include a variety of capabilities such as APIs for distributed caching, queuing and messaging, file and data storage, workload management, user identity, and analytics, thus eliminating the need to integrate disparate components. The PaaS runtime environment executes end-user code according to policies set by the application owner and cloud provider.
Many of the PaaS offerings provide developers with rapid deployment mechanisms, or “push and run” mechanism, for deploying and running applications. PaaS offerings support a range of application infrastructure (or middleware) capabilities, such as application servers, database management systems, business analytics services, mobile back-end services, integration services, business process management systems, rules engines, and complex event processing systems. Such an application infrastructure assists developers by reducing the amount of code that must be written while expanding the application’s functional capabilities.The most important use case for PaaS is strategic—build, test, deploy, enhance, and scale applications rapidly and cost-effectively.

Let’s look at some more use cases for PaaS: API development and management: Organizations are using PaaS to develop, run, manage, and secure APIs and microservices, which are loosely coupled, independently deployable components and services.

Internet of Things, or IoT: PaaS clouds support a broad range of application environments, programming languages, and tools used for IoT deployments.

Business analytics/intelligence: PaaS tools allow organizations to analyze their data to find business insights that enable more informed business decisions and predictions.

Business Process Management, or BPM: Organizations are using the PaaS cloud to access BPM platform delivered as a service.

Master data management, or MDM: Organizations are leveraging the PaaS cloud to provide a single point of reference for critical business data such as information about customer transactions and analytical data to support decision making.

Let’s look at some advantages of using PaaS: Scalability, made possible because of the rapid allocation and deallocation of resources with a pay-as-you-use model offered by PaaS. 

The APIs, support services, and middleware capabilities that PaaS clouds provide assist developers in focusing their efforts on application development and testing, resulting in faster time to market for their products and services.

Middleware capabilities also reduce the amount of code that needs to be written while expanding the application’s functional capabilities.

Greater agility and innovation because using PaaS platforms means that you can experiment with multiple operating systems, languages, and tools without having to invest in these resources.

You can evaluate and prototype ideas with very low risk exposure resulting in faster, easier, less-risky adoption of a wider range of resources.

Some of the key PaaS offerings available in the market today include AWS Elastic Beanstalk, Cloud Foundry on IBM Cloud, IBM Cloud Paks, Windows Azure, RedHat OpenShift, Magento Commerce Cloud, Force.com, and Apache Stratos.

PaaS clouds do come with some risks—risks that all cloud offerings have in general, such as information security threats and dependency on the service provider’s infrastructure. Services can get impacted when a service provider’s infrastructure experiences downtime.
Customers also don’t have any direct control over the changes that may take place when a provider makes changes in its strategy, service offerings, or tools.

But the benefits can far outweigh these risks—PaaS continues to experience strong growth and is predicted to become the prevailing platform delivery model moving forward.

In the next video, we will look at Software-as-a-Service model, its features, benefits, and some use cases.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Software-as-a-Service, “SaaS”, or simply “sass”, is a cloud offering that provides users with access to a service provider’s cloud-based software. SaaS providers maintain the servers, databases, and code that constitute an application.They also manage access to the application, including security, availability, and performance. Applications reside on a remote cloud network, and users use these applications without having to maintain and update the infrastructure. Core business processes supported by SaaS today / include
email and collaboration via offerings such as Microsoft's Office 365 and Google's Gmail, Customer Relationship Management via services such as NetSuite CRM and Salesforce, Human Resource Management via services from Workday and SAP SuccessFactors, financial management, billing and collaboration, and many more.

According to Forrester Research, SaaS has overtaken on-premises solutions in categories such as human capital management (HCM), customer relationship management (CRM), and collaboration.

Solutions once available with several different deployment options are now SaaS-only. Let’s look at key characteristics of Software-as-a-Service: 
SaaS clouds have a multitenant architecture.Infrastructure and code are maintained centrally and accessed by all users. SaaS makes it easy for users to manage privileges, monitor data use, and ensure everyone sees the same information at the same time. Security, compliance, and maintenance are all part of the offering. Users can customize applications to fit their business processes with point-and-click ease. Users can customize the UI to work with their branding guidelines; they can modify data fields and enable or disable features within the business process. These customizations are preserved through upgrades. Users pay for the use of the services via a subscription model. The use of resources can be scaled easily, depending on service needs.

Key benefits of adopting SaaS: Businesses can directly procure solutions without upfront capital and assistance from IT, greatly reducing the time from decision to value from months to days.
SaaS greatly increases workforce productivity and efficiency.
Users can access core business apps from wherever they; they can also buy and deploy apps in minutes reducing the typical obstacles enterprises have to to test the products they they might use.
Using SaaS applications, individuals and small enterprises can spread out their software costs over time.

Let’s look at some use cases for SaaS: Organizations are moving to SaaS for their core business needs as part of their strategic transformation to reduce on-premises IT infrastructure and reduce capital expenditure.

Oragnzaitions are leveraging SaaS to avoid the need for ongoing upgrades, maintenance, and patching, done traditionally by internal IT resources; applications run reliably with minimal input, for example, email servers and office collaboration and productivity tools.

Organizations are increasingly opting for SaaS eCommerce Platforms to manage their websites, marketing, sales, and operations.

With SaaS, organizations are able to take advantage of the resilience and business continuity of the cloud provider.

Enterprises are now developing SaaS integration platforms (or SIPs) for building additional SaaS applications, moving SaaS beyond standalone software functionality to a platform for mission-critical applications.
SaaS does evoke some concerns, as well.Primary among them being data ownership and data safety. Security is an important consideration when you’re allowing a third-party to maintain business-critical data. And application access relies on a good internet connection—if you’re not connected, you cannot access the apps.

But the benefits far outweigh the concerns, with SaaS making up the largest segment of the cloud market today.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

In our introductory cloud video, we briefly mentioned the three deployment models for cloud.

In this video, we will discuss the Public Cloud deployment model in more detail.

Deployment models indicate where the infrastructure resides, who owns and manages it, and how cloud resources and services are made available to users. The three cloud deployment models include—Public Cloud, Private Cloud, and Hybrid Cloud.

In a public cloud model, users get access to servers, storage, network, security, and applications as services delivered by cloud service providers over the internet.Using web consoles and APIs, users can provision the resources and services they need.

The cloud provider owns, manages, provisions, and maintains the infrastructure, renting it out to customers either for a subscription charge or usage-based fee. Users don’t own the servers their applications run on or storage their data consumes, or manage the operations of the servers, or even determine how the platforms are maintained. In very much the same way that we consume and pay for utilities such as water, electricity, or gas in our everyday lives, we don’t own any of these cloud resources—we make an agreement with the service provider, use the resources, and pay for what we use within a certain period. Public clouds offer significant cost savings as the provider bears all the capital, operational, and maintenance expenses for the infrastructure and the facilities they are hosted in. It makes scalability as easy as requesting more capacity. However, with a public cloud, the user does not have any control over the computing environment and is subject to the performance and security of the cloud provider’s infrastructure. There are several public cloud providers in the market today, such as Amazon Web Services, Microsoft Azure, IBM Cloud, Google Cloud Platform, and Alibaba Cloud.

While all providers include a common set of core services, such as servers, storage, network, security, and databases, they also offer a wide spectrum of niche services with varied payment options.

Let’s talk about some of the characteristics of a public cloud:

A public cloud is a virtualized multi-tenant architecture enabling tenants or users to share computing resources, residing outside their firewalls. The cloud providers pool of resources, including infrastructure, platforms, and software, are NOT dedicated for use by a single tenant or organization. Resources are distributed on an as-needed basis offered through a variety of subscription and pay-as-you-go models.

Public clouds have significant benefits; we’ll go over some of these benefits here:

Vast on-demand resources are available, allowing applications to respond seamlessly to fluctuations in demand. Considering the large number of users that share the centralized cloud resources on-demand,the public cloud offers the most significant economies of scale.
The sheer number of server and network resources available on the public cloud means that a public cloud is highly reliable—if one physical component fails, the service still runs unaffected on the remaining available components. It’s also important to note some concerns users have regarding public clouds—key among them being security and data sovereignty compliance. Security issues such as data breaches, data loss, account hijacking, insufficient due diligence, and system and application vulnerability seem to be some of the fears users continue to have concerning security in the public cloud.

With data being stored in different locations and accessed across national borders, it has also become increasingly critical for companies to be compliant with data sovereignty regulations governing the storage, transfer, and security of data.A service provider’s ability to not just keep up with the regulations, but also the interpretation of these regulations, is a concern shared by many businesses.

Let’s look at some common use cases for public cloud:

Organizations are increasingly opting to access cloud-based applications and platforms so their teams can focus on building and testing applications, and reducing time-to-market for their products and services. 
Businesses with fluctuating capacity and resourcing needs are opting for the public cloud. 
Organizations are using public cloud computing resources to build secondary infrastructures for disaster recovery, data protection, and business continuity.

More and more organizations are using cloud storage and data management services for greater accessibility, easy distribution, and backing up their data.

IT departments are outsourcing the management of less critical and standardized business platforms and applications to pubic cloud providers.

In the next video, we will look at the private cloud model, its features, benefits, and some use cases.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

The National Institute of Standards and Technology defines Private Cloud as cloud infrastructure provisioned for exclusive use by a single organization comprising multiple consumers, such as the business units within the organization. It may be owned, managed, and operated by the organization, a third party, or some combination of them, and it may exist on or off premises.”

Private cloud platforms can be implemented internally or externally. When the platform is provisioned over an organization’s internal infrastructure, it runs on-premises and is owned, managed, and operated by the organization. When it is provisioned over a cloud provider’s infrastructure, it is owned, managed, and operated by the service provider.

This external private cloud offering that resides on a cloud service provider’s infrastructure is called a Virtual Private Cloud, or VPC.

A VPC is a public cloud offering that lets an organization establish its own private and secure cloud-like computing environment in a logically isolated part of a shared public cloud.

Using a VPC, organizations can leverage the dynamic scalability, high availability, and lower cost of ownership of a public cloud, while having the infrastructure and security tailored to the organization’s unique needs.

Virtual Private Clouds are offered by most Public Cloud providers such as IBM and Amazon. A private cloud is a virtualized environment modeled to bring in the benefits of a public cloud platform without the perceived disadvantages of an open and shared public platform.

Users of a private cloud, such as Developers and Business Units in an organization, still get to leverage benefits such as economies of scale, granular scale, operational efficiencies, and user self-service, while exercising full control over access, security, and compliances specific to their organization and business.

Private clouds provide you with The ability to leverage the value of cloud computing using systems that are directly managed or under perceived control of the organization’s internal IT.

The ability to better utilize internal computing resources, such as the organization’s existing investments in hardware and software, thereby reducing costs.Better scalability through virtualization and “cloud bursting,” i.e., leveraging public cloud instances for a period of time but returning to the private cloud when the surge is met.

Controlled access and greater security measures customized to specific organizational needs. The ability to expand and provision things in a relatively short amount of time, providing greater agility.

Organizations may choose to opt for private cloud because of various reasons—because their applications provide a unique competitive advantage, there are security and regulatory concerns, or because the data is highly sensitive and subject to strict industry or governmental regulations.

Let’s look at some common use cases for a private cloud:

A private cloud is an opportunity for organizations to modernize and unify their in-house and legacy applications. Moving these applications from their dedicated hardware to the cloud also allows them to leverage the power of the compute resources and multiple services available on the cloud. 

Using the private cloud, organizations are integrating data and application services from their existing applications with public cloud services. This allows them to leverage their private cloud’s compute capability for the larger jobs while pulling data into an application on a private cloud to leverage public cloud services—essentially opening their data centers to work with cloud services.
Application portability is a key feature of cloud platforms.

Using the private cloud gives organizations the flexibility to build applications anywhere, and move them anywhere, without having to compromise security and compliance in the process.

Some of the key reasons that may prevent an organization from moving to a public cloud include security and regulatory concerns, and data sensitivity. A private cloud offers these organizations the benefits of on-demand enterprise resources while exercising full control over critical security and compliance issues from within the environment of their dedicated cloud.

In the next video, we will look at the hybrid cloud model, its features, benefits, and some use cases.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Hybrid cloud is a computing environment that connects an organization’s on-premise private cloud and third-party public cloud into a single, flexible infrastructure for running the organization’s applications and workloads. The mix of public and private cloud resources gives organizations the flexibility to choose the optimal cloud for each application or workload. Workloads move freely between the two clouds as needs change. Organizations can choose to run the sensitive, highly-regulated, and mission-critical applications
or workloads with reasonably constant performance and capacity requirements on private cloud infrastructure while deploying the less-sensitive and more-dynamic workloads on the public cloud. With proper integration and orchestration between the public and private clouds, you can leverage both clouds for the same workload. For example, you can leverage additional public cloud capacity to accommodate a spike in demand for a private cloud application (also known as “cloud bursting”).

The key tenets of a hybrid cloud are interoperability, scalability, and portability. 

Hybrid cloud is interoperable—which means that the public and private cloud services can understand each other’s APIs, configuration, data formats, and forms of authentication and authorization. 

When there is a spike in demand, a workload running on the private cloud can leverage the additional public cloud capacity, making it scalable.

A hybrid cloud is also portable—since you’re no longer locked-in with a specific vendor, you can move applications and data not just between on-premise and cloud systems, but also between cloud service providers. Hybrid is about taking the best of both worlds. There are 2 common types of hybrid clouds: Hybrid monocloud and Hybrid multicloud.

A hybrid monocloud is a hybrid cloud with one cloud provider, while a hybrid multicloud is an open standards-based stack that can be deployed on any public cloud infrastructure.

The difference lies in the flexibility that the hybrid multicloud offers organizations to move workloads and environments from one vendor to another. 

There is also a variant of hybrid multicloud, called the composite multicloud, which makes this flexibility even more granular as it distributes single applications across multiple providers, allowing you to move application components across cloud services and vendors
as needed.

Hybrid cloud offers significant benefits in areas of security and compliance, scalability and resilience, resource optimization and cost-saving. A hybrid cloud lets organizations deploy highly regulated or sensitive workloads in a private cloud while running the less-sensitive workloads on a public cloud.

Using a hybrid cloud, you can scale up quickly, inexpensively, and even automatically using the public cloud infrastructure, all without impacting the other workloads running on your private cloud.

Because you’re not locked-in with a specific vendor and also don’t have to make either-or decisions between the different cloud models, you can make the most cost-efficient use of your infrastructure budget.

You can maintain workloads where they are most efficient, spin-up environments using pay-as-you-go in the public cloud, and rapidly adopt new tools as you need them.

A typical organization will have a range of applications and workloads spread across private, public, and traditional IT environments.
This represents a range of opportunities for optimization via a hybrid cloud approach.

Let’s look at some increasingly common hybrid cloud use cases:

Software-as-a-Service integration. Through hybrid integration, organizations are connecting Software-as-a-Service applications
available in the public cloud to their existing public cloud, private cloud, and traditional IT applications to deliver new solutions.

Data and AI integration. Organizations today are creating richer and more personal experiences by combining new data sources on the public cloud—such as weather, social, the Internet of Things, CRM, and ERP—with existing data and analytics, machine learning, and AI capabilities.

Enhancing legacy apps. An increasing number of organizations are using public cloud services to upgrade the user experience of their on-premises applications and deploy them globally to new devices, while incrementally modernizing their core business systems.

VMware migration. More and more organizations are “lifting and shifting” their on-premises virtualized workloads to a public cloud without conversion or modification to reduce their on-premises data center footprint and position themselves to scale without added capital expense.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

		In this module, you have learned:

		● Cloud computing allows us to utilize technology as a service, leveraging remote resources on-demand, on a pay-as-you-model. There are three main service models available on the cloud—Infrastructure-as-a-Service, Platform-as-a-Service (PaaS), and Software-as-a-Service (SaaS).
			o   IaaS provides the fundamental compute, network, and storage resources for customers on-demand.
			o   PaaS provides customers the hardware, software, and infrastructure to develop, deploy, manage, and run applications created by them or acquired from a third-party.
			o   SaaS provides access to users to a service provider’s cloud-based software. Users simply access the applications on Cloud while the Cloud provider maintains the infrastructure, platform, data, application code, security, availability, and performance of the application.

		● Deployment models indicate where the infrastructure resides, who owns and manages it, and how cloud resources and services are made available to users. There are three main deployment models available on the cloud—Public, Private, and Hybrid.
			o   In the Public cloud model, the service provider owns, manages, provisions, and maintains the physical infrastructure such as data centers, servers, networking equipment, and storage, with users accessing virtualized compute, networking, and storage resources as services.
			o   In the Private cloud model, the provider provisions the cloud infrastructure for exclusive use by a single organization. The private cloud infrastructure can be internal to the organization and run or on-premises. Or, it can be on a public cloud, as in the case of Virtual Private Clouds (VPC) and be owned, managed, and operated by the cloud provider.
			o   In the Hybrid cloud model, an organization’s on-premise private cloud and third-party, public cloud is connected as a single, flexible infrastructure leveraging the features and benefits of both Public and Private clouds.


-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
module4:

Learning Objectives, After completing this module, you will be able to:

Describe the key components of cloud infrastructure
Explain virtualization
List the features and benefits of virtual machines
List the features and benefits of bare metal servers and how they differ from virtual servers
Describe how to build a secure cloud networking presence
Explain how contain-based technology works


After choosing the cloud service model and the cloud type offered by vendors, customers need to plan the infrastructure architecture.
The infrastructure layer is the foundation of the cloud. This layer consists of physical resources that are housed in Regions, Zones and Data Centers. A Cloud provider’s IT environment is typically distributed across many Regions around the world.

A cloud Region, is a geographic area or location where a Cloud provider’s infrastructure is clustered, and may have names like NA South or US East. The cloud Regions are isolated from each other so that if one Region was impacted by a natural disaster like an Earthquake, the Cloud operations in other Regions would keep running.

Each Cloud Region can have multiple Zones (or Availability Zones or AZ for short), which are typically distinct Data Centers with their own power, cooling and networking resources. These Zones can have names like DAL-09 or us-east-1. The isolation of zones improves the cloud’s overall fault tolerance, decreases latency, and avoids creating a single shared point of failure. The Availability Zones (and DataCenters within them) are connected to other AZs and regions, private datacenters and the Internet using very high bandwidth network connectivity.

A cloud Data center is a huge room or a warehouse containing cloud infrastructure. These data centers contain pods and racks or standardized containers of computing resources such as servers, as well as storage, and networking equipment - virtually everything that a physical IT environment has.

Computing Resources: Cloud providers offer several compute options
– Virtual Servers, Bare Metal Servers, and “Serverless” computing resources.
Most of the servers in a cloud datacenter run hypervisors to create virtual servers or virtual machines (also called VMs for short), that are software-based computers, based on virtualization technologies. Other servers in the racks are bare metal servers that are physical servers that aren’t virtualized. Customers can provision VMs and Bare Metals servers as and when they need them and run
their workloads on them. Cloud users can also run their workloads on serverless computing resources, which are an abstraction layer on top of virtual machines.We will talk about all three compute options in greater detail in subsequent videos.

Storage: Information and data can consist of files, code, documents, images, videos, backups, snapshots, and databases and can be stored
in many different types of storage options on the Cloud.Bare Metal Servers and Virtual Servers are provisioned with default storage in local drives. Since these cloud servers can be provisioned and decommissioned by customers on demand and freed up for use by other users, any information stored in a local drive can be lost when you delete or decommission a cloud server. However there are other storage options available on the cloud to persist data that you can choose depending on factors like how important your data is, how quickly you want to be able to access it, how often you access it, and how secure you need it to be. These additional storage options include Block storage, File storage, and Object storage. Block and file storage modes are commonly used in traditional data centers, but “often struggle with scale, performance and distributed characteristics of cloud.” Object storage is the most common mode of storage in the cloud as it’s both highly distributed and resilient.We will examine Object Storage and the other storage options in more detail in later videos.

Networking: Networking infrastructure in a cloud datacenter includes traditional networking hardware like routers and switches, but more importantly for users of the Cloud, the Cloud providers have Software Defined Networking (or SDN) options where certain networking resources are virtualized or made available programmatically, through APIs. This allows for easier network provisioning, configuration, and management in the cloud. When servers in the cloud are provisioned, you need to setup their public and private network interfaces.
The public network interfaces, as the name suggests, connect the servers to the public internet, whereas the private ones provide connectivity to your other cloud resources and help keep them secure. As in the physical IT world, network interfaces in the cloud need to have IP addresses and subnets either assigned automatically or configured. In a cloud environment it is even more important to configure which network traffic and users can access your resources, which can be done by setting up Security Groups and Access Control
Lists (or ACLs). For further security and isolation of your resources in the cloud, most Cloud providers provide Virtual Local Area Networks (VLANs), Virtual Private Clouds (VPCs), and Virtual Private Networks (VPNs). Some of the traditional hardware appliances such as firewalls, load balancers, gateways and traffic analyzers can also be virtualized and made available as services in the cloud.
Another networking capability provided by the Cloud Providers is Content Delivery Networks or CDNs, that distribute content to multiple points throughout the world so users accessing the content can access it more quickly by getting it from a point nearest to them. We will learn more about some of these cloud networking options and terminology in subsequent videos.

Cloud infrastructure is constantly advancing and improving. In the next video, we explain virtualization and virtual machines.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Hi. My name is Kaleigh Bovey, with the IBM Cloud team and today we're going to be talking about virtualization. As you know virtualization is a fairly old technology, but it's still super relevant to building our cloud computing strategy today. So, first off, what is virtualization? Simply put, virtualization is the process of creating a software based, or virtual, version of something, whether that be compute, storage, networking, servers, or applications. And what makes virtualization feasible, is something called the hypervisor. We're going to write that here. What a hypervisor is, is it's simply a piece of software that runs above the physical server, or host. And there are a couple different types of hypervisors out there. What they do is essentially pull the resources from the physical server and allocate them to your virtual environments. There are two main types of hypervisors out there. 

One being Type 1. Very simple to remember. And 2, you guessed it, Type 2. 

So let's start with Type 1. A Type 1 hypervisor is a hypervisor that is installed directly on top of the physical server. They're also called bare-metal hypervisors. So we'll write that up here. Remember these are the most frequently typed of use hypervisors and they're most secure, they lower the latency, and these are the ones that you'll see in the market the most. Some examples would be VMware, ESXi, or Microsoft Hyper-v, or even open-source KVM. 

The other type of hypervisor is a Type 2 hypervisor, over here. And what makes these different is that there is a layer of host OS that sits between the physical server and the hypervisor. By that nature they are also called, Hosted. These are a lot less frequent. They're mostly used for end-user virtualization. You might see some in the market that are called: Oracle, VirtualBox, or VMware Workstation. Again, they're a lot less frequent. They're a bit more...They have a higher latency than a Type 1 hypervisor. 

So once you have your hypervisor installed, you can build virtual environments, or virtual machines, or simply put, VMs. So let's spin up some environments. What makes a VM a VM? A VM is simply a software based computer. They're run like a physical computer. They have an operating system and applications, and they're completely independent of one another, but you can run multiple of them on a hypervisor. And the hypervisor manages the resources that are allocated to these virtual environments from the physical server. Because they're independent you can run different operating systems on different virtual machines. You could run Windows here, or Linux here, or UNIX here for example.
Because they're independent they're also extremely portable. You can move a virtual machine from one hypervisor to another hypervisor on a completely different machine almost instantaneously, which gives you a lot of flexibility and a lot of portability within your environment. So looking at all of this - this is the core virtualization as a process. So let's talk about a couple key benefits that you want to take away from this. 
1) Cost savings.: When you think about this and the fact that you can run multiple virtual environments from one piece of infrastructure, means that you can drastically reduce your physical infrastructure footprint. This is consolidation at its core. And the fact that you don't have to maintain nearly as many servers, run as much electricity, save on maintenance costs, means that you save on your bottom line at the end of the day. 
2) Would be agility and speed:  Like I said, spinning up a virtual machine is relatively easy and quick - a lot more simple than provisioning an entire new environment for your developers if they say they want to spin up a new environment so that they can run a test scenario. Whatever it might be, virtualization makes that process a lot simpler and quicker. And 

3) lowers your downtime : Let's say that this host goes out unexpectedly. The fact that you can move virtual machines from one hypervisor to another, on a different physical server, means that you have a great backup plan in place. Right? So, if this host goes down you can simply move your VMs very quickly to another hypervisor on a machine that is working.  Virtualization and VMs are at the center of cloud computing and provide many benefits. In the next video, we will discuss the types of virtual machines.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Virtual Machines or VMs are also known as Virtual Servers or Virtual Instances or simply Instances depending on the cloud provider.
The various cloud providers make VMs available in a variety of configurations and deployment options to serve different use cases.
When you create a virtual server in the cloud, you specify the Region and Zone or Data Center you want the server to be provisioned in and the Operating System you want on it., You can choose between shared (that is, a multi-tenant) VMs or dedicated (that is,
a single-tenant) VMs. You can also choose between hourly or monthly billing, and select storage and networking options for the virtual server. Now let’s look at a few different types of VMs that can be provisioned in the cloud. Shared or Public Cloud VMs are provider-managed, multi-tenant deployments that can be provisioned on-demand with predefined sizes. Being multi-tenant means that the underlying physical server is virtualized and is shared across other tenants or users. To satisfy different workloads, cloud providers offer predefined sizes and configurations ranging from a single virtual core and a small amount of RAM to multiple virtual cores and
much larger amounts of RAM s.

For example there can be configurations for Compute Intensive workloads, Memory intensive workloads, or High Performance I/O. Rather than pick from only pre-defined sizes, some providers also offer custom configurations that allow users to define the number of cores
and RAM and local storage characteristics. Public VMs are usually priced by the hour (or in some cases even seconds) and configurations
start as low as pennies per hour. Some providers also let you get monthly VMs, which can result in some cost savings if you
know you will run the VM for at least a month, but if you decide to de-commision the VM in the middle of the month, you will still be charged for the full month. Transient or Spot VMs take advantage of unused capacity in a cloud data center. Cloud providers make this unused capacity available to users at a much lower cost than regular VMs of similar sizes. Although the Transient VMs are available at a huge discount, the Cloud provider can choose to de-provision them at any time and reclaim the resources for provisioning regular, higher-priced, VMs. Because you run the risk of losing these VMs when capacity in the data center decreases, these VMs are great for non-production workloads such as testing and developing applications. They are also useful for running stateless workloads, testing scalability, or running big data and high performance computing (HPC) workloads at a low cost.

Reserved virtual server instances allow you to reserve capacity and guarantee resources for future deployments.You reserve desired amount of virtual server capacity, provision instances from that capacity when you need them, and choose a term, such as 1 year or 3 years, for your reserved capacity. You're guaranteed this capacity within the data center of your choice for the life of the contract term. By committing to a longer term, you can also lower your costs compared to hourly or monthly instances.
This can be useful when you know you require at least a certain level of cloud capacity for a specific duration. And if you exceed your reserved capacity, you can always choose to supplement your unplanned usage and capacity requirements with hourly or monthly VMs.

Note however that not all predefined VMs families or configurations may be available as reserved.

Dedicated hosts offer single-tenant isolation. This means that only your VMs run on a given host so they can make exclusive use of full capacity and resources of the underlying hardware. When provisioning a dedicated host you to specify the data center and POD in which you want your host placed. You then assign instances, or virtual machines, to a specific host. This allows for maximum control over workload placement. Dedicated hosts are typically used for meeting compliance and regulatory requirements or meet specific licensing terms.

Virtualization and VMs are at the center of cloud computing and provide many benefits.

In the next video, we will discuss bare metal servers, what they are and what they provide.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

A bare metal server is a single-tenant, dedicated physical server. In other words, it's dedicated to a single customer. The cloud provider actually takes the physical server and plugs it into a rack in a data center for customers. The cloud provider manages the server up to the operating system (OS), which means if anything goes wrong with the hardware or rack connection, they will fix
or replace it and then reboot the server. The customer is responsible for administering and managing everything else on the server.
Bare metal servers are either preconfigured by the cloud provider to meet workload packages or they can be custom-configured as per customer specifications. This includes the processors, RAM, hard drives, specialized components, and the OS. Customers can also install their own OS and can install certain hypervisors that aren't available from the cloud provider, and thus create their own virtual machines and farms. With bare metal servers you can also add GPUs, which are designed for accelerating scientific computation, data analytics, and rendering professional grade virtualized graphics. Because bare metal servers are physical machines, they take longer to provision than virtual servers. Pre-configured builds of bare metal can take 20 to 40 minutes to provision and custom-builds can take around three or four hours, but these provisioning times can vary by Cloud provider. As Bare Metal servers are dedicated for use by a single client at any given time, they tend to be more expensive than similarly sized Virtual Machines. Also note that unlike virtual servers, not all cloud providers provide Bare Metal servers." Since bare metal servers are fully customizable, they can do what a customer wants in the most demanding environments. Bare metal servers are dedicated and intended for long term, high performance use in highly secure and isolated environments. Clients have full access and control of bare metal servers because there’s no hypervisor required. This means that they can be scaled up and optimized for high availability as needed. As there is no sharing underlying server hardware with other customers, Bare metal servers fulfil the demanding needs of high-performance computing (HPC) and data intense applications that require “minimal latency-related delays”. These servers also excel in big data analytics applications and GPU-intensive solutions. Some workload examples that bare metal servers satisfy are ERP, CRM, AI, Deep Learning, and virtualization.
If you use any applications that require high degrees of security control or apps that you’ve typically run in an on-premises environment, then a bare metal server is a good alternative in the cloud. When comparing bare metal servers to virtual servers, some of the most important considerations are found in customer need. Bare metal servers work best for: CPU and I/O intensive workloads,
excel with highest performance and security, satisfy strict compliance requirements, and offer complete flexibility, control and transparency but come with added management and operational overhead. Whereas, virtual servers are rapidly provisioned, provide an elastic & scalable environment, and are low cost to use, however since they share underlying hardware with other virtual servers, they can be limited in throughput and performance.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

As cloud environments gain greater adoption, and digital data invites rapidly increasing cybersecurity threats, building secure networks on the cloud is crucial. Let’s look at how we can build a secure cloud networking presence.¯
As one might expect, the notion of building a cloud network is not much different from deploying a network in an on-premises data center.
The main difference stems from the fact, that in the cloud, we use logical instances of networking elements as opposed to physical devices. For example, Network Interface Controllers (NICs) would be represented by vNICs in cloud environments. In the cloud, networking functions are delivered as a service rather than in the form of rack-mounted devices.
To create a network in the cloud, one starts by defining the size of the network, or the IP address range that establishes the boundaries or the cloud network. Cloud networks are deployed in networking spaces that are logically separated segments of the networks using options, including Virtual private Cloud (VPC) that in turn can be divided into smaller segments called subnets. Logically segmented cloud networks are private carveout of the cloud that offer customers the security of private clouds and the scalability of public clouds. Cloud resources, such as VMs or Virtual Server Instances (VSIs), Storage, network connectivity and load balancers are deployed into subnets. Using subnets allows users to deploy enterprise applications using the same multi-tier concepts used in on-premises environments. Subnets are also the main area where security is implemented in the cloud. Every subnet is protected by Access Control Lists (ACLS) that serve as a subnet-level fire wall.

Within the subnet, one could create Security Groups that provide security at the instance level such as VSIs.
Once you build a subnet, then it is time to add some VSIs and storage to it so that you could run your applications. Let’s say you have a 3-tier application that require web access VSIs, applications tier VSIs and backend database VSIs.
In this case, we would place the web facing VSIs into one Security Group, the Application VSIs in a second Security Group, while the database VSIs in a third SG. It goes without saying that the web-facing VISs need Internet access. A public Gateway instance is added to the network to enable users’ access to the application in the internet tier. While public gateways are great for Internet access to the cloud, enterprises are interested in extending their on-premises resources to the cloud by securely connecting them using
Virtual Private Networks, or VPNs. When building many subnets and deploying several workloads, it becomes necessary to ensure
that applications continue to be responsive. That is achieved with Load Balancers that ensure availability of bandwidth for the different
applications. Enterprises with hybrid cloud environment find using dedicated high-speed connections between clouds and on-premises resources is a more secured and more efficient way than public connectivity solutions. Some cloud service providers offer such connectivity, such as IBM Cloud and its Direct Link solution that enables extending on-premises resources to the cloud as needed.
Building a cloud network entails creating a set of logical constructs that deliver networking functionality that is akin to the data center networks that all IT professionals have come to rely on for securing their environments and ensuring high performing business applications. 

In the Next video we’ll look at Containerization technology and why Containers have become a de-facto element of Cloud Native computing.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Containers are an executable unit of software in which application code is packaged, along with its libraries and dependencies, in common ways so that it can be run anywhere, whether it be on desktop, traditional IT, or the cloud. Containers are small, fast, and portable, and unlike virtual machines, they do not need to include a guest OS in every instance and can, instead, simply leverage
the features and resources of the host OS. In the rest of this video, we will see how container-based technology really works.   

Hi everyone. My name is Sai Vennam and I'm a developer advocate with IBM. Today I want to talk about containerization. Whenever I mention
containers, most people tend to default to something like Docker or even Kubernetes these days. But container technology has actually been around for quite some time. It's actually back in2008 that the Linux kernel introduced C groups, and control groups, that basically
paved the way for all the different container technologies we see today.

So that includes Docker, but also things like Cloud Foundry, as well as Rocket and other container runtimes out there. Let's get started with an example, and we'll say that I was a developer.  I've created a node.js application and I want to push it into production.
We'll take two different form factors to kind of explain the advantages of containerization. Let's say that first we'll talk about VMs, and then we'll talk about containers. First things first, let's introduce some of the things that we've got here. We've got the hardware itself, just a big box. We've got the guest, or rather, the host, operating system, as well as a hypervisor. Hypervisor is actually what
allows us to spin up VMs. Let's take a look at this shared pool of resources with the host OS and hypervisor. We can assume that some of
these resources have already been consumed. Next, let's go ahead and take this .js application and push it in. And to do that, I need a Linux VM, so let's go ahead and sketch out that Linux VM. In this VM there's a few things to note here. We've got another operating
system, in addition to the host OS, it's gonna be the guest OS, as well as some binaries and libraries. That's one of the things about Linux VMs, that even though we're working with a really lightweight application, to create that Linux VM, we have to put that guest OS in there, in a set of binaries and libraries. That really bloats it out. In fact, I think the smallest node .js VM that I've seen out there is 400 plus mega bytes, whereas the node.js runtime and app itself would be under 15. So we've got that and we'll go ahead and let's push that .js application into it. Just by doing that alone, we're gonna consume a set of resources. Next, let's think about scaling this out. So we'll create two additional copies of it, and you'll notice that even though it's the exact same application,
we have to use and deploy that separate guest OS and libraries every time. And so we'll do that three times. And by doing that, essentially, we can assume that for this particular hardware we've consumed all of the resources. There's another thing that I haven't mentioned here, but this .js application, I developed it on my macbook. So when I pushed it into production to get it going on the VM, and notice that there were some issues and incompatibilities. This is the kind of foundations is big, he said, she said issue. Where things might be working on your local machine, and work great, but when you try to push it into production, things start to break.
And this really gets in the way of doing agile DevOps, and continuous integration and delivery. That's solved when you use something like containers. There's a three-step process when kind of doing anything container related, and then pushing, or creating, containers. And it almost always starts with first, some sort of a manifest. So something that describes the container itself. In the Docker world, this would be something like a Docker file. And in Cloud Foundry, this would be a manifest Channel. Next, what you'll do is create the actual image itself. For the image, again, if you're working with something like Docker, that could be something like a Docker image. If you're working with Rocket it would be an ACI or application container image. So regardless of the different containerization technologies, this process stays the same. The last thing you end up with is an actual container itself. You know, that contains all of the runtimes, and libraries, and binaries needed to run an application. That application runs on a very similar set up to the VMS, but what we've got on this side is, again, a host operating system. The difference here, instead of a hypervisor, we're gonna have something
like a runtime engine. So if you're using Docker this would be the Docker engine and, you know, different containerization technologies would have a different engine. Regardless, it's something that runs those containers. Again, we've got this shared pool of resources, so we can assume that that alone consumes some set of resources. Next, let's think about actually containerizing this technology. We talked about the three-step process. We create a dockerfile. We build out the image. We push it to a registry, and we have our  and we can start pushing this out as containers. The great thing is, these are going to be much more lightweight. So deploying out multiple containers, since you don't have to worry about a guest OS this time, you really just have the libraries, as well as the the application itself. We've scaled that out three times, and because we don't have to duplicate all of those operating system dependencies and create bloated VMs, we actually will use less resources. So use a different color here... and scaling that out three times, we still have a good amount of resources left.

Next, let's say that my coworker decides, hey, for this .js application, let's take advantage of a third party - let's say a cognitive API - to do something like image recognition. Let's say that we've got our third party service, and we want to access that using maybe a Python application. So he's created that service that acts as that third party APIs. And with our node.js application, we want to access that Python app, to then access that service. If we wanted to do this in VMs, I'm really tempted to basically create a VM out of both the .js application and the Python application. Because essentially that would allow me to continue to use the VMs that I have. But that's not truly cloud native, right? Because if I wanted to scale out the .js, but not the Python app, I wouldn't be able to if they were running in the same VM. So to do it in a truly cloud native way, essentially I would have to free up some of these resources. Basically get rid of one of these VMs, and then deploy the Python application in it instead. And you know, that's not ideal. But with the container based approach what we can do is simply say, since we're modular, we can say, okay, just deploy one copy of the Python
application. So we'll go ahead and do that. There's a different color here. And that consumes a little bit more resources. Then with those remaining resources, the great thing about container technology, that actually becomes shared between all the processes running. In fact, another advantage if some of these container processes aren't actually utilizing the CPU or memory, all of those shared resources become accessible for the other containers running within that hardware. So with container-based technology, we can truly take advantage of cloud native based architectures. We talked about things like portability of the containers. We talked about how it's
easier to scale them out. And then overall, with this kind of three-step process and the way we push containers, allows for more agile devops and continuous integration and delivery. Containers streamline development and deployment of Cloud Native applications.

In the next lesson, we will cover cloud storage.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------


		In this module, you have learned:

		● Cloud infrastructure consists of data centers, storage, networking components, and compute resources.

		● Virtualization is the process of creating a software-based version of physical resources, made possible through the use of hypervisors. 

		● A few different types of Virtual Machines can be provisioned on the cloud. These include:
			o   Shared or Public Cloud VMs that are provider-managed, multi-tenant deployments that can be provisioned on-demand with predefined sizes
			o   Transient or Spot VMs that take advantage of unused capacity in a cloud data center
			o   Reserved VMs that allow you to reserve capacity and guarantee resources for future deployments 
			o   Dedicated hosts that offer single-tenant isolation

		● Bare metal servers are single-tenant physical servers that are dedicated to a single customer. Bare metal servers fulfil the demanding needs of high-performance computing (HPC) and data intense applications and are ideal for applications that have a high degree of security or compliance requirements.

		● Networking capabilities in the cloud are delivered as a service rather than in the form of rack-mounted devices. Cloud resources, such as VMs (or VSIs), storage, network connectivity, and load balancers, are deployed into subnets within Virtual Private Clouds (VPCs). Using private and public subnets allows users to deploy multi-tier enterprise applications securely. Load balancers distribute the traffic and allow applications to be responsive.

		● Containers are an executable unit of software in which application code is packaged, along with its libraries and dependencies, in common ways so that it can be run anywhere—desktops, traditional IT, or the cloud. Containers are lighter weight and consume fewer resources than Virtual Machines - helping streamline the development and deployment of cloud native applications.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
module5:

Learning Objectives, After completing this module, you will be able to:

Describe and differentiate between the four main types of cloud storage - Direct Attached, File Storage, Block Storage and Object Storage
Explain the benefits of Content Delivery Networks

Cloud storage is where you save data and files in the cloud.Certain storage must be attached to a compute node before the storage can be accessed, whereas other storage types can be directly accessed either through the public Internet or a dedicated private network connection.

Cloud providers host, secure, manage, and maintain the cloud storage and associated infrastructure to ensure you have access to your data when you need it. Cloud storage services allow you to scale your capacity as you need so you only pay for what you provision, usually on a ‘per gigabyte’ basis. The cost of storage will vary by type but in general, the faster the read / write speed
of the storage, the higher the per gigabyte cost. Cloud storage is available in four main types – 

Direct Attached, File Storage, Block Storage and Object Storage.

Direct Attached storage – sometimes referred to as ‘Local Storage’ - is storage which is presented directly to a cloud-based server and is effectively either within the host server chassis or within the same rack. This storage is fast and normally only used to store a server’s operating system, although it can have other use cases.The main two reasons why direct attached storage is not so great for other uses besides to store the operating system is that it’s typically ‘Ephemeral’ – meaning that it only lasts as long at the compute resource it’s attached to – it cannot be shared with other nodes and while you can use RAID techniques, it’s not as resilient to failure as other types of storage.

File storage is typically presented to compute nodes as ‘NFS Storage’. NFS stands for Network File System and means that the storage is connected to compute nodes over a standard ethernet network. NFS-mounted storage is common-place but it tends to be slower than either direct-attached storage or block storage because the data travels over an ethernet network. It also tends to be lower cost than either direct attached or block storage. One advantage of File Storage is that it can be mounted or used on multiple servers at once.
File-based storage is a simple, straightforward approach to data storage and works well for organizing data in a hierarchical folder structure, that desktop users are familiar with.

Block storage is presented to compute nodes using high-speed fibre connections, which means that read and write speeds are typically much faster and reliable than with file storage, making block storage suitable for use with databases and other applications where disk
speed is important. You typically provision block storage in ‘volumes’, which can then be mounted onto a compute node, which it then effectively sees as another hard drive. Volumes can normally only be mounted onto one compute node at a time. 

	With both File and Block storage, you may also hear the term ‘IOPS’.IOPS stands for ‘Input/Output Operations Per Second’ and relates to the speed of the storage or to put it another way, how quickly data can be read from or written to the storage. We’ll cover this in a little more detail in a later video.

	Persistence is a term that is used when provisioning File or Block storage and relates to what happens to the storage once the compute node it is attached to is terminated. If the storage is set to ‘persist’ then it will not be deleted along with the compute
	node, meaning that it and its data are preserved and available to mount onto another compute node, though you will continue to pay for the storage. You can also, in some cases, set the storage so that it is automatically deleted with the compute node that it is mounted onto – in this case, as we know, it becomes Ephemeral Storage. Here, you will also stop paying for the storage but you will lose any data unless it is backed up somewhere. 

	There are several ways to backup data in the cloud but one way to back up both File and Block storage is to take a Snapshot. As the term implies, this is a point in time image of the storage. Snapshots are usually fast to create (they don’t actually write any data, or rather they create metadata), don’t require downtime and subsequent snapshots record only changes to the data. They are great for returning storage to the way it was at a particular snapshot, though note, they cannot be used to recover individual files.

The fourth kind of storage is Object storage.This is a different type of storage in so much as it’s not attached to a compute node,
rather it is accessed via an API. Of all the storage types, Object Storage is by far the cheapest and also the slowest in terms of read and write speeds, but it is infinite in size to the end user. Unlike File and Block storage where you provision a certain storage capacity and it fills up over time, with Object Storage you can keep adding files to it and it never fills up, you just pay for what you use. This makes Object Storage a fantastic repository for all sorts of unstructured data types,large and small, including documents, video, logs, backups, data from IoT, application binaries and virtual machine images.

In the following videos, there will be more detailed information on the different types of storage. Cloud storage provides increased workflow and security. In the next video we cover file storage.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

In this video, we’re going to talk about File Storage in greater detail. Like direct attached storage, file storage must be attached to a compute node before it can be accessed and have data stored on it. However, File Storage can be less expensive, more resilient to failure, and involve lesser disk management and maintenance for you as the user to do , as compared to direct attached storage.
You can also provision much larger amounts of File Storage and present it as a disk to a server. File storage is mounted from remote storage appliances. That is, the physical disks are contained in a separate, specialised piece of hardware and they are then connected to the compute node via the underlying infrastructure in the datacentre. These storage appliances are not only extremely resilient to failure, the data is also far more secure in them as these storage appliances offer services such as encryption in transit and encryption at rest. These appliances are all managed by the service provider. File Storage is mounted to compute nodes via an ethernet network – the same kind of network that you might receive email or browse the internet over, although this ethernet network is normally dedicated to the task. This means it can sometimes be referred to as ‘Network Attached Storage’, ‘Network File Storage’ or simply ‘NFS.
One of the issues with ethernet networks is that their speed can vary – the more loaded an ethernet network is, the more likely it becomes that it’s speed or bandwidth will be affected. Of course, Cloud Providers build their storage networks to handle very high volumes of traffic but even so, consistent speed cannot be guaranteed. Therefore, File storage tends to be used for workloads where consistently high network speeds are not a requirement. In terms of workloads, File Storage can typically be mounted onto more than one compute node at a time, where the mounted disk or volume looks just like another drive on the compute node.

The ability for File Storage to be mounted to multiple compute nodes at a time make it an ideal solution where some sort of common storage is required – for example, a departmental file share, a ‘landing zone’ for incoming files that need to be processed by an application, or a repository of files that a web service might access. In these applications, the potential variance in the speed of the connecting network is not really an issue. Of course, where cost is an issue, you can use file storage for other applications such
as databases, but the trade-off is speed. When you provision file storage, one consideration you need to take into account is the IOPS
capacity of the storage. IOPS stands for Input/Output Operations Per Second and refers to the speed at which the disks can write and read data (note this is not the speed of the network between the storage and the compute node). The higher the IOPS value, the faster the speed of the underlying disk. A higher IOPS will also normally cost more. Understanding IOPS is important because if the IOPS value is too low for your application, the storage can become a bottleneck and cause your application to run slowly. Alternatively, if the IOPS is too high, you will probably be paying more that you need to for your storage. For example, a file share may be mounted on 30 different compute nodes and an application writes and requests data to and from that share 60 times per minute.
You can average that out to 1 operation per second. With this simple example, you can see that each application has different IOPS requirements. 

In the next video, we’re going to talk more about Block Storage, how it compares with File Storage, and when you would typically use one over the other.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

In this video, we will discuss Block Storage and how it compares to File Storage in the Cloud.
Block storage breaks files into chunks (or blocks) of data and Stores each block separately under a unique address. Like direct attached storage and file storage, block storage also must be attached to a compute node before it can be utilized for your workloads.
Block storage, like file storage, can be mounted from remote storage appliances, making it extremely resilient to failure, and keeping data far more secure in them, on account of encryption in transit, and encryption at rest services - available on these appliances.
Block storage is mounted as a volume to compute nodes using a dedicated network of fibres, through which signals move at the speed of light. These fibre optic networks are more expensive to build than the ethernet ones which deliver File Storage, which is one reason why Block Storage tends to have a higher price-point. However, since the traffic is moving faster and with speed consistency, they are perfect for workloads that need low-latency storage to work effectively. In terms of workloads, it is important to note that unlike File Storage, which can be mounted onto 80 computer nodes or more, Block storage is normally mounted onto only one compute node at a time.
Since these disks run at a consistent high speed, they are perfect for workloads that need consistently fast storage, such as databases and mail servers. Block storage is not suitable for workloads where there needs to be some level of disk sharing between compute nodes.
For block storage, as it is for file storage, you need to take the IOPS capacity of the storage into account.
Most cloud providers will allow you to specify IOPS characteristics when you provision storage and, in some cases, adjust the IOPS of your storage as you need, so if the requirements or usage behaviour of an application changes, you can adjust accordingly. So, to summarise the commonalities and differences between these two storage types:
Block and File Storage is taken from appliances which are maintained by the service provider.
Both are normally highly available and resilient and will often include data encryption at rest and in transit.
File storage is attached to compute nodes using an ethernet network, so it is sometimes called Network attached or NFS Storage.
File storage is very reliable, but the speed of the connecting network can vary, based on load.
Block storage is attached via a high-speed fibre network, which is very reliable and consistent.
File storage can be attached to multiple compute nodes at once.
Block storage can only be attached to one node at a time.
File storage is a good choice where file shares are required, where workloads do not require lightning fast connectivity to storage, or where cost is a factor.
Block storage is a good choice when supporting an application that needs consistent fast access to disk, such as databases.

Remember to consider the IOPS requirements of the application when provisioning either file or block storage.

In the next video, we’ll start to look at Object Storage.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

In this video, we’re going to start to understand what Object Storage is, how data is stored in Object Storage, and how it differs from the more traditional storage types such as File and Block Storage.

The first thing to note about Object Storage is that you do not connect it to a particular compute node in order to use it.
Instead, you provision an Object Storage service instance and use an API (or Application Program Interface) to upload, download, and manage your data. This means you can directly use Object Storage with anything that can call an API and you don’t need an underlying compute node. 
The second thing to note about Object Storage is that it’s less expensive that other cloud storage options.
It’s per gigabyte cost is typically a couple of US cents per month and in some cases, even less, depending on the storage tier used.
More on storage tiers later. 
The third and possibly most important thing to note about Object Storage is that it’s effectively infinite. With file and block storage, you specify the size of the storage you want in gigabytes or terabytes and then pay a fee based on the size you provisioned.
With Object Storage, you just consume the storage you need and pay per gigabyte cost for what you use.
You can keep uploading files and the storage will never run out. 

So, when would you use Object Storage?
Well, Object Storage is great for storing large amounts of unstructured data. By unstructured this means that the data is not stored in any kind of hierarchical folder or directory structure – Object Storage uses ‘buckets’, and objects are stored within these buckets in a structurally flat way. A bucket is a bit like a folder, in the sense that you can give them meaningful names, and of course have different buckets for different object-types but you cannot place a bucket within a bucket. When an object is placed in a bucket, it also has some metadata (data about the data) added to it, such as an object ID.This metadata helps applications to both locate and access the object, as well as provide information on the time that the data was stored or last accessed. When you create a bucket, you don’t need to provide or define any sizing information—the bucket will just hold the data that you place inside it and the service provider ensures that there is sufficient storage capacity available. Buckets can hold as little as a few bytes of data, right up to multiple petabytes and you can build up the amount of data stored as slowly or quickly as you like—as well as shrink it back down again.
The service provider also takes care of resilience and making sure that the Object Storage solution is highly available. Some cloud providers offer different types of buckets with different levels of resilience.

For example, they offer buckets which are resilient, but the data is only stored in one data centre.

This is a good option where data needs to reside in a particular geographical location or in situations where high availability is less of an issue. They will then offer buckets which are highly available across regions, where the data is stored multiple times in different datacentres (or zones) in the same region or even in multiple regions.

These options usually cost more but they provide both the highest level of resilience as well as availability for your data.
Object Storage has a very ‘flat’ storage structure, which we’ll explain in the next lesson.

This data can be anything from text files to audio and video files, from IOT data to virtual machine images, from backup files to data archives. Pretty much any data which is static and where fast read and write speeds are not necessary would make a good fit for object storage.

Object Storage would, however, not be suitable for running operating systems, nor applications such as databases or anything else where the contents of the files changes. So, to summarize what we have learned in this lesson:
Object Storage is used to store files—or Objects—which are static. The data that you can store using Object Storage can be anything from text files to audio and video files, from IOT data to virtual machine images, from backup files to data archives. You cannot run operating systems or other applications such as databases using Object Storage. Objects are stored in Buckets. You can have multiple buckets, but you cannot place buckets within buckets. You do not need to specify a size for a bucket, you can just use as little or as much space as you need. Many providers offer different types of buckets with different charges for each. Some are based on resilience and availability, while others are based on the frequency at which the objects inside are accessed. 

In the next video, we’ll be diving into Object Storage data tiers and Object Storage APIs.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

In this video, we’re going to look more closely at Object Storage data tiers and Object Storage APIs.
Object Storage buckets also have storage ‘tiers’ or ‘classes’ associated with them and these tiers are based on how frequently the data is accessed. A standard tier bucket is where you would store objects that are frequently accessed. This tier tends to have the highest per gigabyte cost associated with it. A ‘vault’ or ‘archive’ tier is where you might store documents that are only accessed perhaps only once or twice a month or less, and this will be offered at a lower storage cost, whereas there may also be ‘cold vault’ tier, where you would store data that is typically accessed only once or twice a year. This storage often costs just a fraction of a US cent per gigabyte per month. Often, you can also set up automatic archiving rules for your data, meaning that if an object isn’t accessed for a period of time, it will automatically be moved to a cheaper storage tier. The rule uses some of the object’s metadata to determine when it should be archived. Note that Object Storage does not come with IOPS options. Object Storage tends to be very slow in comparison with file or block storage, where downloads typically take seconds, if not longer, to complete. Where providers offer ‘cold vault’ buckets, data retrieval from these tiers can sometimes even take hours because the storage is kept off-line. If your application needs fast access to files, then Object Storage may not be a good option. We’ve mentioned that Object Storage is priced per gigabyte used but there can also be other costs related to retrieval of the data. These costs are similarly low but access charges can be higher for data that is in vault or cold vault tiers, so it is important to ensure that the data is in the correct tier, based on its frequency of access.
Object Storage does not need to be attached to a compute node for you to access it, rather you access Object Storage through an Application Program Interface, or API. The most common API for object storage is called the ‘S3’ API, which is a standard based on the S3 Object Storage offered by AWS. Many providers offer APIs to their Object Storage which is S3 compatible, which is useful because it means developers can write code which is able to access multiple vendor’s Object Storage. The API itself is an HTTP-based RESTful API or RESTful Web service. The API call allows applications to manage object storage and buckets as well as PUT (upload) or GET (download) objects to and from them, Object storage is not just for new applications but can be used to meet requirements for existing ones.
It can also be used as an effective solution for backup and disaster recovery as a replacement for offsite, tape-based solutions, reducing the time to restore data. Many backup packages now include the ability to back data up into the cloud, using Object
Storage. Object storage is more efficient than tape backup solutions, which require tapes that need to be physically loaded into, and removed from, tape drives, and moved off-site for geographic redundancy.So, to summarize what we have learned in this lesson:

Object Storage has different tiers, with different charges for each.
Some are based on the frequency at which the objects inside are accessed.
Object Storage is priced per gigabyte of storage used per month, plus some charges for data retrieval.
Object Storage is much cheaper than file or block storage.
Object Storage is very slow in comparison with File and Block Storage.
You can often create rules which allow the automatic ‘archiving’ of objects to cheaper tiers when they are infrequently accessed.
Object Storage is accessed using an API.
Many Object Storage providers have an ‘S3 Compatible’ API, which means developers can create code that will work against multiple-vendors Object Storage solutions
Object storage in the Cloud offeres an effective Backup and Disaster Recovery solution.

In the next video, we will be covering Content Delivery Network (CDN), which is driven by Object Storage.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

A content delivery network, or CDN, is a distributed server network that delivers temporarily stored, or cached, copies of website content to users, based on the user's geographic location. A CDN stores this content in distributed locations and reduces the distance between your website visitors, and your website server.
In the rest of the video, we'll learn more about Content Delivery Networks.

Hi. I'm Ryan Sumner, I'm a Chief Network Architect with IBM cloud, and today I'm going to help you answer: what is a content delivery network? So, in short, a content delivery network, or CDN, is a service that accelerates Internet content delivery. In other words, the main benefit of a CDN is that it makes your website faster. Before I get into describing to you how it accomplishes that, and some of the other benefits, first I want to talk to you about some of the challenges that we have where we have users all around the world, but we don't have servers all around the world, and the experience that those users have due to that dynamic. I've got a simple diagram here showing a server hosted down in Dallas. This is my website. And then I have users all around the world. So, in Sidney I might have five. In London I've got five. New York I might have ten. LA I might have ten. I've got 30 users around the world that are accessing my server and my website down in Dallas. Let's kind of follow a set of these users in their journey. Let's look at their users down in Sydney. They make a request to the website. They've got an 8,600 mile hike to Dallas, and then an 8,600 mile hike back. The amount of time that that takes is usually measured in milliseconds, and just that round-trip might be about 170 milliseconds. For our users up in London,
that might be about 100 seconds. Our users in New York City can probably experience about a 40 millisecond round-trip time. And over in
LA, about 30. So as you can see, the further you're away, the longer it takes ultimately, the slower the website will be for you. So
this is where the the CDN comes into play, and this is how it actually accomplishes the increase in speed, which is by reducing the amount of distance between the user and the content, or the server providing the content. What it does by doing that is, it places these content delivery network endpoints in as many locations around the world as possible. And in our case, we're going to assume we've got one in just about every location where our users exist. Now when the user in Sydney, or London, or New York City, or LA tries to access some content, it's first retrieved by the content delivery network service and then distributed around the world. So we have a single
request down to the Dallas server. It's now then distributed all around the world, and our users in London now instead of going all the way to Dallas, they're able to retrieve that content directly from their closest geographical location, drastically reducing the amount of time that it takes to retrieve that content. As you can see here, it's very basic how a CDN is able to provide the benefits to the end-user by reducing the amount of time that it takes to deliver the service. But what you're not seeing here, is an indirect benefit, is
the reduction in the amount of traffic that actually hits the Dallas server. So the indirect benefit is that you actually see a reduction in the load, or a reduction in the amount of capacity that you need in Dallas, to serve all these users. Another indirect benefit because of there's this much less validity, and so much less stuff happening in Dallas, because all these users are having to make these trips. And I'm also not having to communicate with with users so far away. The Dallas environment may also see an increase in uptime. And then lastly, because the users are not really directly communicating with the servers down in Dallas, you have the indirect benefit of an increase in security through obscurity. It's pretty basic to understand how a CDN works in the end to provide a better
benefit to the end user.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

		In this module, you have learned:

		Cloud storage is available in four main types–Direct Attached, File, Block, and Object Storage. These storage types differ in how they can be accessed, the capacity they offer, how much they cost, the types of data they are best suited to store, and their read-write speed.
		Direct Attached (or Local) Storage is storage that is presented directly to a cloud-based server and is effectively either within the host server chassis or within the same rack.
		File Storage is typically presented to compute nodes as a Network File System (NFS), which means that the storage is connected to compute nodes over a standard ethernet network.
		Block Storage is presented to compute nodes using high-speed fibre connections, typically provisioned in volumes, which are mounted onto a compute node.  
		Object Storage is accessed via an API and doesn’t need an underlying compute node. Object Storage offers infinite capacity as you can keep adding files to it and just pay for what you use. Compared to the other storage types, object storage is slowest in terms of read and write speeds.
		A Content Delivery Network (CDN is a distributed server network that accelerates internet content delivery by delivering temporarily stored or cached copies of website or media content to users based on their geographic location.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
module6:


Learning Objectives, After completing this module, you will be able to:

Describe the emergent cloud trends such as Hybrid Multicloud, Microservices, and Serverless
Explain how cloud native applications work
Explain how DevOps helps tackle some of the complexities posed by cloud
Describe the benefits of application modernization and how organizations can modernize their applications

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Hybrid Cloud, as we covered in the previous lesson, is a computing environment that connects with organizations on-premise private cloud
and third-party public cloud into a single infrastructure for running the organization's applications. Multicloud is a cloud adoption strategy that embraces a mix of cloud models from different service providers - public, private, and managed - across infrastructure, platform, or software services. For example, a business may consume email as a service from one provider, a CRM application from another, and infrastructure from yet another provider. So, essentially, a Hybrid Multi-cloud implies you're able to leverage the best of cloud models and services across different service providers, and have your applications and workloads working seamlessly across multiple different clouds. In this video we will look at some use cases for why a business may want to use a hybrid multi- cloud approach.  In this video I want to touch on a few of those use cases for why a business may want to use hybrid or multicloud. Let's start with the basic 
one: cloud scaling. Now most of us are probably familiar with this, it's one of the main reasons for adopting the cloud. Now let's say we have a flower delivery service that is able to hit a certain bottom line of users to have on-premise infrastructure, and it can hit a certain amount of user load. So, visualizing this here throughout a calendar year, you can imagine that their load maybe goes up
and down, and responds to specific holidays. Now to hit those peaks, they could scale up their on-premise architecture, but that's met with upfront costs and cost of upkeep. Now instead what they'll do, is take advantage of cloud that allows them to scale up in response to that load, and then automatically deprovision resources when they no longer need them. This concept is kind of general to cloud computing, not just hybrid or multicloud. That brings me to my next topic. Here we're gonna be talking about how it can be used to build a composite cloud. Essentially this is going to be applications that are spread across multiple cloud environments. Back to the flower delivery service. Let's say they have on-premise architecture that allows them to run three major components of their app. So, let's say they have the web UI. They have some billing API's, as well as a rewards framework. Now let's say that this service is actually based in EU, and their European customers are happy. But for their North American or American customers, it's best specifically around, you know, Veterans Day or Thanksgiving, they're noticing that the system is bogging down. So they decide to take
advantage of a hybrid cloud or multi-cloud architecture by composing their application across multiple cloud environments. So, they'll take advantage of data centers in America, and essentially, they've identified that although the rewards framework can stay on Prem in their European side, they want to move the billing and the UI capabilities over. They'll move just those two to a cloud platform of their choice in a North American or American datacenter. This allows them to scale up portions in response to American holidays, while keeping their EU portions individually scaled. In this example the flower delivery service is able to take advantage of scaling at a global level by using the hybrid or multicloud architecture. 

Next let's talk about the airline or travel industry. We can first start with an example of modernization. In the past we've seen that reservation systems may have been difficult to work with, or you might have had to call in. But almost all the airline companies now have a mobile application. So most of the time, and we've actually found that, it's about - in general - not just in the travel industry, but 80% of all enterprise applications are actually still on Prem. And that's likely the case in this industry as well. So, in this specific example, let's say they have a reservation system that's running on prem. But to create new experiences for their end-users, let's say they've created a mobile application. That mobile app, of course, has a mobile backend that's maybe running in a public cloud. That in turn works with the reservation service. So again, the mobile app can hit the mobile backend, that in
turn works with the reservation capabilities. In this case, they've modernized and new user experiences are possible. But let's take that a step further. A source for a lot of dissatisfaction for users, is whenever their flights are
delayed - so when a flight is delayed, they may have to rebook new flights. The solution is almost always the same. The traveler wants to get to his destination in the easiest way possible. What airline industries have been doing is taking advantage of the cloud to create
maybe a recommendation feature. It allows them to book new flights as soon as the delay is recommended, or as soon as the delay is incurred. That's going to connect up to that mobile backend service, allowing users to be able to book flights through their phone the second of flight is delayed. This not only improves the bottom line for the airline industry, it leads to happier users.

That's one way the modernization has been done. Next, let's take it even a step further and talk about data and AI. For data and AI, the airline industry has been taking advantage of lots of historical data. Over the decades that a company has been around, let's say they
have historical data of when unplanned maintenance has happened on their airline. In fact, 30% of all delay time in the airline industry is actually when unplanned maintenance happens. By taking advantage of, let's say, machine learning or AI capabilities, they could
hook into all of the legacy data that they have - large volumes - and connect them up to machine learning and AI capabilities. This allows airline industries to take advantage of predictive analytics and get insights before errors, or before the unplanned maintenance ever occurs. This again improves their bottom line, leading to happier users and a more efficient airline industry. Today we talked
about four major use cases for hybrid and multicloud platforms: cloud scaling and composite cloud, in the flower delivery service, as well as modernize in data and AI for the airline industry. Another reason for adopting hybrid multicloud strategy is to prevent lock-in to a specific vendor's cloud platform and having flexibility of being able to move workloads from one cloud platform to another as the need arises. 

In the next video, we will understand what a microservices architecture is, its features, benefits, and use cases.
-------------------------------------------------------------------------

micro-services architecture is an approach in which a single application is composed of many loosely coupled and independently deployable smaller components or services these services typically have their own stack running on their own containers they communicate
with one another over a combination of api's events streaming and message brokers for a business what this means is that application components can be developed and updated more efficiently by multiple developers working independently teams can use different stacks and runtime environments for different components facing too much load can be scaled independently reducing the waste and cost associated with having to scale entire applications in this video we'll look at how micro services have shaped application development and also look at a use case that illustrates micro services in action the way developers work to build applications is changing in the past software was built as large monolithic applications where a team of developers would take months to construct a large application built on a common code base these developers would write every part of the application from start to finish now after decades of software development there are vast amounts of code already out there that developers can use as the base of an application meaning they no longer have to create every line of code from scratch cloud development platforms provide developers with an ecosystem of
code that can be easily and securely integrated into applications now instead of building one huge application on one team developers break into small independent teams where they write smaller amounts of code called micro services microservices break down large applications into their core functions for example search recommendations customer ratings or product catalogs each is developed independently of one another yet work together on the cloud development platform to create a functioning application a container is
the distribution method for each micro service meaning it delivers the code where it needs to go containers are plug-and-play so if one
micro service isn't working for an application developers can take it out and put in a different one without disrupting how the rest of the app functions check out micro services in action with Ron Ron is a soccer fan who uses an online streaming media service
called dream game last night he missed watching his team play their crucial semi final match luckily he can watch the match tonight on dream game when he logs in he sees the most popular content among all dream game users after some searching he finds the match he's
looking for what he would really like is to find his game with one click luckily the dream game development team is using micro services to develop a better user experience for viewers like Ron the first micro service is a Content catalog housing the millions of games that Dream game offers the small team of developers organizes each piece of content with metadata that describes them this metadata feeds into a second micro service the search function which ensures that Ron's search results are captured and compared to the dream game catalog the third micro service recommendations captures data about the most popular content among all dream game users this is what generates the home page that ron saw when he first logged in these three micro services are all in their separate containers ready to join the application but before they can work together they have to find one another they do this by using something called service discovery which creates a roadmap for these and many other micro services to communicate when micro services find each other they
communicate using an application programming interface or an API so when Ron searches for his favorite soccer team the search micro service is communicating to the content catalog in an API about what Ron is looking for now back to the goal at hand to get Ron to his soccer game with just one click the development team working on the recommendations micro-service is updating the code adding an analytics algorithm using analytics the recommendations micro-service will compare Ron's viewing history and preferences to popular content among other users including soccer fans and viewers in Ron's geographical region and demographic since the developers didn't need to create the code from scratch they are able to deploy this new functionality in a matter of days these updates happen behind the scenes as the rest of the micro service containers function normally the next time Ron checks dream game instead of just seeing
the most popular or newest content he sees a personalized playlist that will continue to refine itself as the system learns more about his viewing habits and preferences the result Ron finds his favorite team's latest game right away the micro service approach lets
developers quickly innovate applications in parallel and lets users like Ron focus on the things that really interest them and when those interests are changing and growing faster everyday micro services help businesses keep up and grow with their customers

in the next video we will talk about serverless computing its features benefits and some use cases

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Serverless is an approach to computing that offloads responsibility for common infrastructure management tasks such as scaling, scheduling, patching, and provisioning application stacks to cloud providers, allowing developers to focus their time and effort on the code and business logic specific to their applications or process. Serverless doesn’t mean there are no servers; only that the management of the underlying physical or virtual servers is removed from their users. The serverless computing environment allocates resources as needed for the applications. Let’s look at some key attributes that distinguish serverless computing from other compute models. The serverless model requires no provisioning of servers, installation of application stacks and software, or operation of the infrastructure by the developer. Serverless computing runs code only on-demand on a per-request basis, scaling transparently
with the number of requests being served. Serverless enables end users to pay only for resources being used, never paying for idle
capacity, which is unlike virtual servers on the cloud—where end users pay for VMs as long as they are running even if idle.
Effectively, serverless abstracts the infrastructure away from developers. Code is executed as individual functions where each function runs inside a stateless container. No prior execution context is required to serve a request; and with each new request, a new instance of the function is invoked. Let’s look at a scenario. You could, for example, have a serverless platform between the front-end of your website and your storage layer, running individual functions. The serverless app could be translating text files and storing it in a cloud-based storage service. Using the front-end of your website, you send text files to a serverless app; the app creates translations in different languages, and then stores these translated files in cloud storage, and sends their links back to you. Some of the key serverless computing services today include IBM Cloud Functions (which is based on Apache OpenWhisk), AWS Lamb-da, and Microsoft Azure Functions. It is important to note that serverless may not be the best fit for all applications or scenarios.
You need to evaluate application characteristics and ensure that the application is aligned to serverless architecture patterns.
Applications that qualify for a serverless architecture include some of the following characteristics: 
Short-running stateless functions (seconds or minutes).
Seasonal workloads with varying off-peak and peaks.
Production volumetric data that shows too much idle time.
Event-based processing or asynchronous request processing for implementing use cases.

Microservices that can be built as functions that are stateless. Serverless architectures are well-suited for use cases around data and event processing, IoT, microservices, and mobile backends. Given its inherent and automatic scaling, rapid provisioning, and a pricing model that does not charge for idle time, supporting microservices architecture has become one of the most common use cases of serverless computing today. Serverless is well-suited to working with structured text, audio, image, and video data around tasks such as data enrichment, transformation, validation and cleansing, PDF processing, audio normalization, thumbnail generation, and video transcoding. Parallel tasks such as data search and processing, and genome processing, are also well-suited to be run on a serverless runtime. Serverless is also well-suited for working with all sorts of data stream ingestions, including business data streams, IoT sensor data, log data, and financial market data. 

And finally, let’s look at some challenges worth considering about serverless. Serverless workloads are designed to scale up and down in response to workload, but for workloads characterized by long-running processes managing a traditional server environment might be simpler and more cost-effective. The serverless application architecture can be vendor dependent, and so there is a potential for vendor lock-in, particularly involving platform capabilities such as authentication, scaling, monitoring, or configuration management. Because serverless architectures scale up and down in response to workload, they also sometimes need to start up from zero to serve a new request. For certain applications, this delay isn’t much of an impact, but for something like a low-latency financial application, this delay wouldn’t be acceptable.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Simply put, a cloud native application is an application developed from the outset to work only in the cloud environment, or
an existing app that has been refactored and reconfigured with cloud native principles. A cloud native application consists of microservices working together as a whole to comprise an application, yet each can be independently scaled and iterated
through automation and orchestration processes. These microservices are often packaged in containers, which are executable units of software in which the application code is packaged along with its libraries and dependencies so that it can be run from anywhere. This
independence enables frequent, iterative improvement of cloud native applications, without disrupting the experience of end-users. Cloud native applications are unlike traditional, or monolithic applications, that are built out of one huge piece of software; applications that tightly couple the user interface, business-logic layer, and data layer. Let's take the example of how a cloud
native application might be used on a travel website. Each topic covered by the site - flights, hotels, cars, specials - is its
own microservice. Each microservice may roll out new features independent of the other microservices. Specials and discounts can also scale out independently. While the travel site is presented to customers as a whole, each microservice remains independent and
can be scaled or updated as needed without affecting other services. Whether creating a new cloud native application or modernizing an existing application, developers adhere to a consistent set of development principles: 
Follow the microservices architecture approach by breaking applications down to single- function microservices. Rely on containers for maximum flexibility, scalability, and portability.
Adopt Agile methods that speed the creation and improvement process through quick iterative updates based on user feedback. In this video, we'll take a closer look at the key concepts of cloud native, its benefits and use cases. 

Hi. I'm Andrea Crawford and I'm with IBM Cloud. Today we're going to talk about cloud native apps. In the heritage world, we have our lumpy, monolithic apps. And in the new world, we have our microservices living on the cloud. If we take a look at this diagram here, we see we have cloud infrastructure. This is your private, your public, and your enterprise infrastructure. Cloud native apps apply to hybrid and multicloud situations. We also have our scheduling and orchestration layer. This layer is all about control planes, like our kubernetes. We also have our application and data services layer. This layer is all about backing services, and being able to integrate our application code with existing services that may be available on other clouds, or even on-premise. We have our application runtimes, these are what we're traditionally, or conventionally, known as middleware. And over here, well, that's where we have our
cloud native apps. This is the sweet spot right up here. So our application code is actually designed, built, and delivered very differently for cloud native, than it would be for conventional, monolithic, lumpy apps over here. Let's talk a little bit about why cloud native apps can actually leverage benefits like: enabling innovation, business agility, and most importantly - from a technology perspective - the commoditization of this solution stack over here. As time has progressed and technologies have matured and emerged, a
lot of the services are actually being refactored lower down in this stack. This means that core services are starting to have a lower center of gravity, freeing up innovation at this level over here. So, what are our use cases for when to build a cloud native app? Everything! Everything that lives in the cloud should have a cloud native app design and approach. This means our application
code needs to be instrumented with things like: standardized logging, standardized events, and being able to match those logging and events to a standard catalog, that multiple microservices and cloud native apps can use. The last thing we want to do is have our
development squads have to figure out what their log and event messages should be. Let's standardize that, because we want to be able to commoditize that as well. We also need to have things like distributed tracing. When we get over into the microservices world over here,
we have a lot of moving parts. This means we're going to need to leverage services core to the system, like: load balancing, service discovery, and routing. These are the kinds of things that are commoditized in this layer here, with things like Istio, and with the emergence of newer projects, like Knative. And so, if we were to recognize the benefits for cloud native apps and to sum it all up,
we are all about enterprise and engineering at scale. 

In the next video we'll take a look at DevOps.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Development teams need to design, develop, deliver and run software as reliably and efficiently as possible. Operations teams need to identify and resolve problems as soon as possible by monitoring, predicting failure, managing the environment, and fixing issues. Combining development and operations with the ability to monitor and analyze and optimize bottlenecks gives us DevOps—a collaborative approach where business owners and the development, operations, and quality assurance teams collaborate to continuously deliver software. A DevOps approach applies agile and lean thinking principles to all stakeholders in an organization who develop, operate, or benefit from the business’s software systems, including customers, suppliers, partners. By extending lean principles across the software supply chain, DevOps capabilities improve productivity through accelerated customer feedback cycles, unified measurements and
collaboration across an enterprise, and reduced overhead, duplication, and rework. Using the DevOps approach, developers can produce software in short iterations on a continuous delivery schedule of new features and bug fixes in rapid cycles; and businesses can seize market opportunities and reduce time to include customer feedback in their products. 

The DevOps process involves: 
Continuous Delivery, which is about delivering small, well-designed, high-quality, increments of software to customers.

Continuous Integration; creating packaged builds of the code changes released as immutable images; where immutable implies that when modifications are needed, the entire component is replaced with an upgraded version.

Continuous Deployment, which involves progressing each new packaged build through the deployment lifecycle as rapidly as possible.

Continuous Monitoring; with tools that help developers understand the performance and availability of their applications, even before they are deployed to production.

Delivery Pipeline; which is an automated sequence of steps that involves the stages of Ideation, Coding, Building, Deploying, Managing, and Continuous Improvement; which loops back to the Ideation phase in the delivery pipeline.
While DevOps can apply to applications anywhere, there is especially a compelling case for DevOps when it comes to cloud-ready, and cloud-native applications.DevOps and Cloud share a symbiotic relationship. With its near limitless compute power and available data and application services, cloud computing platforms come with their own risks and challenges. DevOps’ tools, practices, and processes are helping tackle some of the complexities and challenges posed by the cloud and allowing solutions to be delivered—quickly and reliably.

Let’s look at some core capabilities that DevOps provides to help building and running applications in the cloud a lot more manageable: DevOps best practices make it possible to programmatically provision servers, build middleware, install application code, and fully automate the installation process in a way that is documented, repeatable, verifiable, and traceable.
Application deployments often involve considerable complexity. The DevOps’ practices of continuous integration and continuous deployment help create a fully automated deployment pipeline, which is important all through the application development lifecycle. Cloud native applications form a complex distributed system with multiple moving parts, independent tech stacks, and rapid release cycles. DevOps principles are essential to define how people work together to build, deploy, and manage applications in a cloud native approach. With the DevOps best practices of automated provisioning and continuous deployment, developers, quality professionals, and other stakeholders can test in low-cost, production-like test environments that were previously not available—enhancing both productivity and quality. When systems are compromised or struggling to recover from natural disasters, DevOps best practices make it possible to rebuild these systems quickly and reliably. DevOps provides a powerful set of principles, practices, and tools to realize the full potential of cloud-native computing, as well as for modernizing existing applications to leverage cloud benefits.

In the next video, we’ll learn about application modernization.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Many organizations have huge investments in existing applications that are often siloed in legacy systems and are very difficult and expensive to update and maintain. Modernizing these applications can unlock great benefits for these organizations such as accelerating their digital transformations, enabling them to take advantage of new technologies and services, and becoming more responsive to their customers' needs and changing market dynamics. Cloud computing is one of the three main ingredients in Application Modernization. In the rest of this video we will see how, and what else Application Modernization entails. 

Hi, I'm Eric Minick, with IBM Cloud, and I want to talk about application modernization and three huge transformations that have
been going on together. We've got three things going on. They're interrelated, and this is what we're seeing this change in how we're doing architecture, infrastructure, and our ways of working - how we deliver. And if we go back in time a little bit, we saw applications that were very monolithic. They were running on physical servers And we used waterfall style development where we'd have long plans and we'd say okay, this is gonna be our planning phase, or development phase, or testing phase, and we could plan out a year as a project. And that's really what we've gone away from. So if we look at how most organizations are working today, architecturally, they've got some sort of distributed architecture. It's usually related to like a service-oriented architecture;the big buzzwords a few
years ago. But some sort of distributed architecture. We have a bunch of web services. They're talking to each other. We've got some databases on the backend.  And then some front ends that kind of go through all that. On an infrastructure level, they're running on some sort of a virtual machine, alright. So, we said we could probably do better than having to order a new server every time we have a new service. Let's virtualize this stuff, and we need a little more density along the way. And from a way of working, you know, Agile development - pretty normal - and then trying to figure out a little bit of what happens downstream. So this kind of takes us up to where a lot of teams are today, but not really where they're going. And so if we look at, kind of, that next phase. We're taking another
pass at this service-oriented architecture, and really shrinking the sizes of the services, taking advantage of the more dynamic infrastructure we have. And we're calling these now microservices. So we've got a microservice architecture, very small, very focused services, moving away from a lot of the heavyweight XML based communication we saw in SOA, towards more rest based communication, things
like that. But same idea; let's keep breaking into smaller and smaller pieces. We have more independence of what we ship. More rigor in saying this service needs to be independent from another service, so I can change these things by themselves. On the infrastructure side - cloud. It's pretty popular. And this could be public cloud, this could also be private cloud. I'm painting with a very
broad brush when I say cloud here. Then from a delivery, in a way of working, we could say that DevOps is really key. And I would include in this, approaches like site reliability engineering, SRE. More the ways of working we have today. Now that that's fine and interesting. But what do these things have to do with each other? I'd argue that what we're really seeing is modernization in how the applications are delivered, and how they're built, and what they are. While you could walk into any large enterprise today and you'll find someone who says we are going through a cloud transformation. You'll often find somebody says, "yes, I'm in charge of leading the DevOps transformation." And you'll walk into enterprise architecture and they'll say, "yes, we are pushing microservice architectures." Individuals think that they're going through three separate transformations. But they're really tied. Right? If I'm doing
microservices, and I have new microservices all the time. In order to get a new microservice up and running, I'm over here and I have
to order a new physical server, then rack and stack it a couple months later. I'm not gonna get any time to market benefits. The resilience benefits that I'm gonna normally look for from microservices are gonna be modest, at best. Microservices want cloud
infrastructure. You want to be able to say, I've got a new microservice. Let me put it in a container and just run that container right now and scale that dynamically. Similarly, cloud really likes running microservices. The benefits of being able to dynamically scale are really cool when you have a lot of small things that you might need few of, or a lot of. It's not as interesting when I've got a monolith that isn't even distributed. How do I scale that? I get a bigger cloud server? Then all of this is, kind of, baking in this idea of speed and resiliency. And DevOps brings that together; the developers who have always wanted speed, the operations people who've always wanted that resiliency. They're going to be programming that cloud. The programmable infrastructure the cloud provides, needs operations people who understand resiliency, but bring some of that development skill in. To really take advantage of these new infrastructures, the new architectures, you need these new ways of working. And you also are gonna say, if this is going to give me time to market benefits, I can't be back here, and say we've got a one-year project plan that we're just gonna execute. I need to be able to be more agile, and adapt in my planning and my responsiveness to the business. I need to better wire up my application so they can be more easily monitored and more resilient. We have to have the application in a way that it knows when one of these services is failing, and we can spin up another. So this is really, for me, fascinating - that you walk into these organizations everywhere, and
they're undergoing these three different transformations. But they're always doing them together. And when they don't - it doesn't quite work. So you've got these three transformations going on at once. And you'll hear us talk a lot about application modernization.
See it written across the top here. When I think of application modernization, I think it's just this. It's this transformation right here; going from these kind of monoliths, or service-oriented architectures, to micro- services, adopting cloud, modernizing our ways working towards DevOps and SRE. that's AppMod (AM). It's a really exciting time. And it's really great when you're able to go after it in a holistic fashion.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

		In this module, you have learned:

		● Hybrid Multicloud is a cloud adoption strategy that makes it possible for public clouds, private clouds, and on-premises IT to interoperate seamlessly while leveraging the best cloud-based services from different public cloud providers.

		● Microservices architecture is an approach in which an application is built as a collection of loosely coupled and independently deployable components or services, leading to efficient development, maintenance, and upgradation cycles.

		● Serverless Computing is an approach to computing that offloads responsibility for common infrastructure management tasks for application runtimes to cloud providers, allowing developers to focus their time and effort on development and testing, and not have to worry about provisioning, maintaining and scaling compute resources.

		● Cloud native applications are applications that are built or refactored to work in the cloud environment. These applications, developed using DevOps methodologies, consist of microservices packaged in containers that can run in any environment—making it possible to create and update features in quick iterative cycles.

		● DevOps is a collaborative approach that enables development and operations teams to continuously deliver software in quick iterative cycles while reducing overhead, duplication, and rework. DevOps’ tools, practices, and processes help tackle the complexities and challenges posed by the cloud, allowing solutions to be delivered and updated —quickly and reliably.

		● Application Modernization helps organizations accelerate their digital transformation, take advantage of new technologies and services, and become more responsive to changing market dynamics. Cloud computing is one of the key enablers of application modernization.
----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Running notes:

>	ibmcloud version
>	ibmcloud Resource Service-Instance
>	ibmcloud ks cluster ls
> 	ibmcloud login --apikey <key>



Cloud essentials

Learning Objectives, After completing this module, you will be able to: 

Summarize what IBM Cloud can do, at a high level 
Explain the various categories of services and offerings available on IBM Cloud 
Work with the IBM Cloud dashboard and CLI to manage your services 
Set up basic IAM configurations for an IBM Cloud account 


IBM Cloud is a combination of Platform as a Service (PaaS), Infrastructure as a Service (IaaS), and Software as a Service (SaaS).
Users can deploy over 200 services from containers, data and AI, to blockchain and more. 

IBM Cloud maintains 60 data centers worldwide, enabling local deployment and global scalability. 47 Fortune 50 companies trust mission-critical applications on IBM Cloud’s infrastructure.

With open-source technologies, such as Kubernetes, Red Hat OpenShift, and compute options such as virtual machines and bare metal, you have the control and flexibility to support workloads in the environment of your choice.

The IBM Cloud platform is composed of multiple components that work together to provide a consistent and dependable cloud experience.

	The IBM Cloud platform is composed of a robust console that serves as the front end for managing your resources,
	an identity and access management component for authentication and access control,
	a catalog consisting hundreds of offerings, and
	an account and billing management system that provides exact usage for pricing plans.

One of the main ways of accessing IBM Cloud is through the IBM Cloud Console. From the
console you can:

read the Docs to learn more about products,
use the Catalog to create new resources,
access the IBM Cloud resources you have provisioned,
use the support tab to open a ticket, 
and invite new users using the user management tab.

The IBM Cloud command-line interface (CLI) allows you to programmatically interact with IBM Cloud through a terminal or shell.

The IBM Cloud CLI is supported by Mac, Linux, and Windows, extendable with plugins, and available through the Console via the IBM Cloud Shell terminal

To interact with services IBM Cloud provides API’s (Application Programming Interface) and SDKs (Software Development Kit).

For example, a developer can use the REST APIs to analyze text content, in the programming language of their choice while SDKs allow a developer to target a specific language. SDKs include support for Python, Node.js, Java, Swift, and other languages depending on the service.

IBM is committed to providing our clients with data privacy, security, and governance solutions to assist them in their journey to compliance readiness. IBM Cloud is built on best-in-industry security standards, including GDPR, HIPAA, ISO 9001, PCI, and SOC2.

Let's look at the IBM Cloud Console in a little bit more detail.
Here on my dashboard you can see my resource summary, which is the most important pane.
Here you can see the Cloud Foundry services I've deployed, my other services I have deployed,storage, and developer tools.
You can also see Classic Infrastructure, your recent support cases, and any IBM Cloud status here as well.
Once you click on catalog, you'll be brought to the IBM Cloud products catalog.
Here you can quickly search for and create an instance of whatever product you may want.
Next, you may want to go into the Docs.
This will show you the documentation for any product you want.
Next, if you click on the support tab, you'll go and be able to raise a ticket, and we will explore this later in one of the modules of the course.
Lastly, in your Manage tab, you can see the status of your account and any sort of billing and usage, and IAM, which we will cover later in the course as well.

Here, we also have the IBM Cloud shell.

And lastly, we have the Cost estimator tool. We'll cover this later in the course as well.

To get started with the IBM Cloud Shell, click on the icon on the top right. First, we'll check the version of our IBM Cloud CLI by issuing the command 
>	ibmcloud version
Next, we'll list all of our service instances on our account by issuing the command 
>	ibmcloud Resource Service-Instance.
Here we see all the instances that are deployed in our account.
Lastly, we will list all of the Kubernetes clusters we have running with the 
>	ibmcloud ks cluster ls
This is the basic overview of the IBM cloud.
Let's summarize:
IBM cloud combines Platform as a Service (PaaS), Infrastructure as a Service (IaaS) and Software
as a Service (SaaS).
IBM cloud has a catalog of over 200 products and services covering containers, data and
AI Blockchain and more.
IBM cloud is committed to compliance and has more than 60 data centers globally.


single zone
multi zone 
federal zone 

IBM Cloud can deploy workloads in over 6 regions, 18 availability zones and 60 data centers

This network spans 19 countries on six continents.

The six IBM Cloud regions are 
Dallas, 
Washington DC 
London, 
Frankfurt, 
Tokyo,
Sydney.

Locations: geography

north america south
north america east  
north america west 
south America
Europe 
Asia Pacific

they further drill down as below: country, metro, Data center (zones)



IBM Cloud has three main types of accounts.
It has Lite accounts which are free of charge.	- 40 services
Pay-as-You-Go accounts which allow you to access all IBM Cloud services - all services , basic support and prod usecases 
Subscription accounts which are available for enterprise customers. - discounted pricing, all services

support:

basic - 24x7 chat and phone
Advanced - + 1 < 1 , 2<2 , 3 <4
Premium  - + 1 <15m , 2< 1 , 3<2 , tech accnt  mgr assigned

billing:

monthly overview, By service, Export usage as CSV


cost tool:

estimate cost of a service (all services supported)
convert to currencies (can convert to 15 currencies)
Export the estimate

IAM:

users and access groups
Services and resources
Access Policies


users > Access groups
Resources > resource groups

(account owner) Acount > many users with their email addresses 

services > vms, Object storage, DB etc.
Resources > a resource is a provisioned service ex: vm-dev, vm-prod,  db-dev, db-prod 

users > invited to join accounts , API keys support for authentication, IAM roles and  aceess are associated with a user
	roles can be : viewer, operator, editor, Adminstrator

access groups> collection of users (admins, billing, basic users) , allows for cleaner seperation of control, users can be part of 	multiple AG

resources >  instance of a service , have automatic service id when created, users can select a region to create the resource , service roles dictate permissions for the services APIS
	roles: reder, writer, manager 

resource groups > collection of resources , rgs are specified at service creation time, it has no geographical restrictions

bringing them all together is called Access Policy the combination of subject, role and target
ex: 
subject > users , access groups
role> manager, editor
target > resources, resource groups

---------------------

Virtual servers:

There are four types of virtual server offerings on IBM cloud.

virtual server service. - This is your usual virtual machine type service that offers a range of operating system and configurable RAM and processing power to fit your use case.

bare metal service. - This service provides you the raw horsepower that you need for processing intensive and disk IO intensive workloads.

power system service. - This service, as its name implies, allows you to spin up power system servers with operating systems such as AIX and IBM I.

hyper protect service. - This service allows you to run virtual servers on IBM Linux 1. You get access to Z technology without having to purchase any unique hardware.

There are different types of virtual servers: can be deployed on any 6 regions
Public servers or multi-tenant:  are billed hourly or monthly.
Dedicated servers:  are like public servers but they're single tenant. No noisy neighbors, so a little bit more expensive 
transient servers:  are the least expensive option, but are  de provisioned as capacity grows.
reserved servers:  These are committed to a one- or three-year contract.
Images: Redhat, Ubuntu, Centos, Debian, Microsoft (with different versions)
we can select upto:
64vCPU, 512 RAM , 1Gbps network speed, 5 SAN volumes, 2 GPUs which based off the NVIDIA Tesla P-100 cards.

bare metal: can be deployed on any 6 regions
billing: Hourly, Monthly, 1yrm 3yr contract
Images: Redhat, Ubuntu, Centos, Debian, Microsoft (with different versions) + VMware, citrix, no OS, Cloud linux 
Vmware , SAP certificed offering available 
4 to 72 core 
up to 6TB ram and upto 36 drives
GPU support which based off the NVIDIA Tesla P-100 cards.


Power systems: Europe, North america south, north america east
Machine types: e880, s922
Images: AIX and IBM I (with different version) or bring your own linux

Hyper protect: Europe, North america south, north america east , asia pacific 
Linux one, secure, Easy to deploy, no Z skills required

virtual servers are low at price but not great at performance or security.
Power systems are great at performace 
Bare metals are very expensive and give high performace
Hyper protect z are great at security 


 ---------------------

Block and File storage:

Block storage: 
File storage:

common between the above 2:
size range from 20GB to 12TB , encryption at rest with no extra cost, no of IOPS up to 48k,  can be provisoned in any DC in the world,
can take snapshots manually or can be scheduled 

diff between abv two:
Block storage uses iSCSI, file use NFS
Block can attach to only 1 host at a time file can be attached to many.
Block storage ideal for high intense workloads like db , file storage ideal for low intensity workloads

Cloud backup: back up and restore data between servers in one or more DC
adv: highly customizable - daily / wekly , OS / specific directory 
its browser based portal, one click restore 
Plugins for Ms sql, MS sharepoint, Oracle 
end to end encryption - 256 bit private key encryption 
geo-redundancy

gotacha - after creating the storage, you have to attach to VM and then within VM you have to mount. 

Object storage: ( seperate lecture)
used for storing vast amount of unstructured data , files are uploaded as objects and saved in to buckets , it has not directory structure just metadata will be available about storage location and date time of insertion etc.

advantages of COS: Access mgmt enabled , encrypted by default additonally u can use your own keys using ibm key protect, sql query supports, high speed transfer, SDKs and APIS

Object storage resiliency have 3 options:
 can store in cross regions - for high availability
 dedicated region - gives high service integration and performace 
 single DC - when you have restrictions to store data within country 
service integration, performace and availability differs based on your selection.

there are 4 storage clases available for IBM COS:

smart tier - high cost saving and accesibility
standard - expensive but highly accessible
vault - high cost saving and accesibility ideal to use when you access the files once in a month
cold valut - high cost saving, less accessible . ideal may be used once or twice an year. 

 ---------------------

 Network Services:

 two different network services

 CIS ( Cloud internet services): - using cloudflare

DNS (Domain name service) - for host name resolution
Transport layer security (TLS) - to secure data
Global Load balancer (GLB) -  to reduce latency and icrease availability by routing based on server availability and health
Rate limiting - Which automatically identifies and mitigates excessive requests  
Ddos Protection -  A scalable and configurable service that protects againist brute force atacks
smart routing - which ensures content is delivered on the fastest path from end user to application 
Web Application Firewall (WAF) -  a layered defense to protect data against sophisticated attackers and malicious bots
caching - which reduces latency and improves performance.

networking Infrastructure services:

Direct links - creates a direct private connection between remote networks and IBM Cloud. With direct link you have a secure dedicated connectivity. It gives you private access to IBM Cloud infrastructure. It offers a fully integrated hybrid environment. Whether your resources are in a data center or on IBM Cloud, direct link is perfect for creating multi cloud connectivity in a single environment.
with direct link you can choose speed between 50 mbps to 10 gbps

CDN - A CDN is a highly distributed platform of servers to help minimize delays. based on akamai , smarter scaling, secure , u can use it to optimize dynamic content , usage based pricing 

Load Balancer - used to distribute traffic among to your virtual servers. You can choose between an IBM Cloud load balancer or a Citrix Netscaler VPX load balancer. Layer 4 and layer 7 , Public and private, server health checks, SSL offload,  monitoring metrics.

Gateway Appliance  -enables you to create virtual routers, firewalls and private networking devices.

Firewall - There are both hardware and software-based firewalls. These will prevent malicious activity, helping to ensure uptime of your server. You can add a firewall to a specific virtual server.

VPN - VPNs facilitate connectivity from your network to IBM's private network.

Subnet and IPs - subnets provide additional IP addresses for virtual machines. They are managed independently of virtual machine resources and are available until cancelled.

VLAN - A VLAN is used to provide packet identification and to let multiple workloads coexist on the same physical equipment.

 ---------------------

VPC ( Virtual Private Cloud):

a secure isolated private cloud hosted within a public cloud with an on-demand configurable pool of shared resources allocated within a public cloud environment. There is isolation between users achieved through private IP subnets and encrypted communication channels. authenticates users and provides remote access to the shared resources. This is essentially allowing organizations to work on a virtually private cloud.

Virtual private clouds provide the necessary infrastructure in isolation as a fully automated solution.

key componets of VPC are: 
VPC network > Availability zone > subnet >> Virtual server instances, k8s, ssh keys, block storage, floating ip, lb, public gateway , vpn gateway. by default  a 100 Gigabyte General purpose block storage volume is created automatically.
the VPC network has access to many cloud services such as AI, databases, IoT and Container Registry. The network also has access to DevOps services including monitoring, log analysis, and continuous delivery.

in IBM cloud we have two generations of VPC - 
gen1 - available on all 6 regions, upto 16gbps networking , provider manged security or bring your own
gen2 - available in 5 regions, upto 80gbps networking, provider manged security only

 ---------------------

 vmware:

 In 2016, IBM Cloud became the first cloud vendor to bring VMware services to the cloud.

 VMWare dedicated - Baremetal solution with vCenter and Vsphere options
: 	customer has access to the hypervisor.
	vcenter - fully automated VMware based software defined data center
	vsphere - Manually configure networking , storage and addons
	Bring your own licence
	add on services( veeam , zerto, f5 big ip and 10 more)

Vmware shared - Maanged deployment of vcloud director
:	IBM manages the hypervisor
	cost effective
	Perfect for temporary migration and burst
	Disaster recovery
	Self-service

---------------------

k8s, Openshift, cloud foundary, cloud functions 

Containers and kubernetes:

IKS - IBM cloud kubernetes service
: 	fully maged environment with upgrades
	secure cluster with (PCI, HIPPA ready ,SOC1 and many more)
	singe and multizone configurations
	supported add ons (service mesh or serverless add ons with few clicks)
	logging and monitoring

	available in all 6 regions 
	types: 	virtual shared (2vcpu/4gb ram - 64/512), 
			virtual dedicated (2vcpu/4gb ram - 56/242)(single tenant instance), 
			baremetal (4vcpu/32gb ram - 28/512), 

	billing: hourly, monthly, free (at this moment)

container registry - a fully managed multi-tenant registry, hig available, public and private, vulnarability advisor
helm catalog - access to IBM products, opensource projects like jenkins, tekton , multiple architecture like x86 powerNZ

You first start off by logging into your IBM Cloud account.
You select a region, you select a resource group, then you list or push images into a container registry with the IBM Cloud CR images command. You can list or create new Kubernetes clusters with the IBM Cloud KS command, and you can interact with your Kubernetes cluster with the kubectl Command.

---------------------

Openshift:

it is based on open source project (OKD) 
it is a lyaer built on top of kubernetes
deployable on-premise or on a cloud
enhanced security from RHEL


k8s - quatr minor release 1.19 is latest , core network, the platform or user is responsible for integrating beyond the core framework.
os - quatr release 4.4 is latest , k8s core + abstraction, opinions, an integration of common features are included.

So how does OpenShift extend Kubernetes?
The first is it provides an integrated Container Registry.
It has a powerful integrated console that improve the experience for developers and operators.
OpenShift takes the Kubernetes namespace concept and extends it with projects, allowing you to control access between who can access namespaces or projects.
OpenShift greatly simplifies developer workflow with source to image and routes.
Lastly, system administrators can use built-in monitoring tools like Grafana and Prometheus.

IBM Cloud offers a highly available, fully managed OpenShift offering. In a matter of minutes, you can spin up your own OpenShift cluster and start deploying applications, allowing developers to focus on creating applications, not managing infrastructure.

other benifits including - automated upgrades and patching
secure clusters ( PIC , HIPPA ready , SOC1 n more)
single and multizone configurations
integrated with logDNA and sysdig
Multiple versions supported (3.11 , 4.x)

available in all 6 regions

virtually shared, vitrtually dedicated, bare metal
same profiles ((2vcpu/4gb ram - 64/512) like k8s
billing is hourly and monthly - no free tier

whats new on OS4: Operator framework, Openshift service mesh based on ISTIO, OS serverless computing based on K native , OS pipelines based on tekton, codeready workspaces (Red Hat Code ready workspaces uses Kubernetes and containers to provide a user with a consistent
and secure development environment.)

ways to try OS: IBM cloud, IBM Z, IBM power, aws, Azure and gcp, redhat os platform, rh virtualization, OS playground, RH code ready containers, VMware vsphere or any other baremetal

---------------------

cloud foundary:

it is a PaaS offering: 

traditional IT: X
IaaS: networking, storage, servers, virtualization
PaaS: networking, storage, servers, virtualization, O/S, Middleware, Runtime
SaaS: networking, storage, servers, virtualization, O/S, Middleware, Runtime, Data, Application

its an Opensource project that had its initial release in 2011. In 2015, the project was transferred to the newly created Cloud Foundry Foundation. The source code for Cloud Foundry is under an Apache license.

deployment automation - You can deploy apps to Cloud Foundry using existing tools with zero modification to the code.

Flexible Infrastructure: By decoupling applications from infrastructure, you can make individual decisions about where to host workloads on premise, in public clouds or in managed infrastructure.

commercial Options: Cloud Foundry is container-based architecture runs apps in the most popular programming languages. And on the choice of your cloud infrastructure. IBM Cloud, AWS, Azure, GCP and more.

Community support: Over 3,500 contributors 12,000 Slack participants and 850 meetups worldwide.

when you deploy with Cloud Foundry on IBM Cloud, you'll get a fully managed multi-tenant environment.
There are three ways to deploy your Cloud Foundry application on IBM Cloud.

-	The first is to add a toolchain that includes the IBM Cloud continuous delivery service to your application.
-	you can deploy from the application level console.
-	bind to other IBM services automatically.

There are many benefits to using Cloud Foundry on IBM Cloud.
These include access control.
You can set up fine grain assignment of compute capacity to development teams with IBM Cloud
IAM policies.
Health management.
Applications that are crashing will automatically try to restart.
Automatic routing.
Publicly reachable URLs are automatically created for your applications.
It's also Lite tier compatible.
No credit card required.
The Lite tier limit has a memory of 256 megabytes of application runtime.
This is good enough for most weekend projects.
There are many Cloud Foundry runtimes that are supported on IBM Cloud.
This includes Java, node.js, Python, Go, Swift, PHP.net, Tomcat ,and Ruby.

manifest.yaml  - name, buildpack, memory, instances

ibmcloud cf push 

as alternate to cf we have - google app engine , aws elastic beanstack 

---------------------

Cloud functions: (serverless)

no server or resource management
focus on microservices
Pay only for code execution

IBM cloud functions is a functions as a service (FaaS) based on opensource project Apache openwhisk which has 
integrated API gateway : An API gateway is a component of cloud functions to expose API's. It comes with security, oauth support, rate limiting and custom domain support.

IBM Cloud functions also supports open API, previously known as swagger.

Cloud functions have built in integrations with other IBM Cloud services such as AI, databases, object storage.

It also has support for external providers such as GitHub and GitLab. 

IBM Cloud functions offer up to 5 million free executions per month.

And lastly, there is logging in monitoring through the IBM Cloud Console.

When talking about cloud functions, we have to talk about actions, triggers, and sequences.

Actions -  are the building blocks of your serverless architecture.They contain the code performing the work and can be invoked via a rest API or trigger.

Triggers - receive events from outside IBM Cloud functions and invoke all connected actions. (A webhook for a GitHub repository would be an example of a trigger.)

Sequences - invoke multiple actions in linear order.This makes it possible to pass parameters from one function to the next.

sample usecase - ETL , Alarm driven (batch or cron, one time or repeated)

Cloud functions on IBM Cloud support many different runtimes.
You have the option of choosing from Java, Node, Python, Go, Swift, PHP, Ruby or any other language or framework by leveraging containers.

---------------------

Databases:

an organized collection of data - SQL, NoSQL

Relational - SQL used to update and query db
Relational databases are also great for asset compliance and high transaction applications such as online transaction processing.

Document - NoSQL document stores include customer data, user generated content, and order data.

Key Value - noSQL databases are leaderboards, caches, and shopping cart data

Database as a service is a cloud computing service that lets users access and use a cloud
DBaaS - cost effective mgmt, secure, available and scalable, Faster time to market
:	DB2, DB2 hosted (with admin access) , MySQL, Postgres
: 	Mongo , Cloudant (based on couchDB with 99.99% SLA), Elastic search
:	Redis, etcd 


---------------------

Integration:

integrations used to send data between applications : it provides connectivity, routing and transformation and enables sharing data, connecting applications and security

comes as free and lite tier plan

API connect: provides API creation and management with security rich features and centralized governance.
:	geenrate swaggger APIs, Graphically assemble APIs, Share APIs with self service portal, API analytics

APP connect: allows you to connect your applications, automate tasks with hundreds of built-in connectors.
:	Automate your workflow, Integrate with 75+ connectors, use 50+ templates to get connected, create and expose flows as REST APIs.

Event Streams: which is a high throughput message bus built with Apache Kafka.
: Fully managed kafka service, HA, Intutive User experience, Event driven architecture, integrates with IBM services


MQ: which provides enterprise grade messaging.
: Fully managed messaging service, extend messaging to the cloud, IBM cloud and AWS compatible, use MQ explore or console

---------------------

Artificial Intelligence:

data science - is a a method for creating insights from data using analytics and machine learning

Many usecases from all industries : healthcare, banking, Education
80% of data scientist time finding , cleaning and organizing the data.
Once we have data, we can built models that can predict and forecast

AI - is a huge field with many different domains

machine learning, NLP, Speech, Vision, robotics , Planning and optimization

AI framework - Tensor flow, scikit learn, pytorch


AI on IBM :

AI lifecycle management tools : 
watson studio : Build ,run and manage AI models  
watson ML: Run anddeploy models
Knowledge catalog: categorize and share data and models
watson Openscale: Monitor AI models
Natural language understanding: uses deeplearning to extract metadata
tone analyser: analyse and understands emotion
Watson assistant 
Discovery:search service
Knowledge studio, Speech to text , text to speech, Language translator (can translate upto 68 languages)
Natural language classifier : assign custom categories to inputted text

---------------------

Analytics:

the science of analysing raw data inorder to make conclusions about that information

Analytics cycle - Planning, descriptive, Diagnostic, Predictive , Prespective

apache spark , hadoop

IBM offers  5 different analytics services

Analytics engine: spark and haddop, scalability, HIPPA ready in dallas region, Customizable env
Streaming analytics: support for text audio video, real time analytics , integrates with spark and hadoop, built in domain analytics
DB2 wearhouse: train ML models, Highly scalable, secure, Oracle compatible
cognos Dashboard: creae visualization, live connection to data, embed visualization, explore data
Information server: Extract transform laod with dataStage, DataLineage with information govt catalog, data profiling with info visualizer.

---------------------

DevOps:

IBM support toolchain

Code: gilabCE, github, bitbucket
delivery: HELM, Razee, tekton
run: cf, k8s, virtual servers
learn: new relic, google analytics, sauce labs
culture: slack, pagerduty, jira

---------------------

Block Chain:

a permanant,growling list of records of records called blocks linked using cryptography
genesis block - first block

block chains are distributed, immutable, smart contracts

Hyperledger fabric is foundation framework to build blockchain apps.

supported by aliyun, aws, gcp, azure and ibm, oracle 

Opensource hosted by linux foundation

smart contracts -code that stored in a block chain and automatically executes.
consensus - how nodes agree on order of transacation

---------------------

IOT - use cases

Predective mentainance
Asset tracking 
Connected vehicles

	- connect and register devices
	- Information mgmt.
	- real time analysis
	- Risk and security management

ibm cloud IOD dashboard gives:

connected devices
show data transfered
monitor sensors
geo visualization
---------------------

Cloud Packs:

containerized software solutions built to run anywhere (IBM cloud, on-prem any cloud)

values of cp:
Modular architecture - you can pick and choose which software to apply
Put AI to work 
Built on openshift

cp for - apps, data, integrations, automation, security, multicloud mgmt














